BUCCANEERS OF BLACK POND 

===| Chapter 1 ===

This morning Billy would earn his nickname.

It was cold that morning, in that New England town by the sea. Billy’s family wasn’t rich enough to live by the ocean, rather they were addressed in the center of town. Their house was two stories though the first floor was partially dug into the ground and surrounded by a trench. Crushed sea shells lined the trenches bottom while poking halfway over the lawn was the kitchen and living room window.
 
Though frost gathered on the edges of every window, the frost on the living room reflected a blue light. The sapphire screen of a television inside whined. In its mouth, a worn-out plastic vhs tape. It was a favorite of Billy’s father. 

Beneath the stairs snored the hulking man. He was sleeping in a red recliner covered in stains. Stains derived from what was out of his hand, a can of watered-down off-brand beer. 

A few more were at his feet, in carpet that was also stained, but the rest of the living room was clean. Or at least, untouched.

Far to Dad’s left, dust gathered on the framed pilot license in the windowsill, at the foot of which were some disregarded drapes. Ahead, between the television and the kitchen entrance, crumpled a shepherd's-crook that was a plant. Right, sticking out of a grey-brick fireplace, nails that hadn’t seen stockings in a year.

Over Dad’s head the stairs creaked.

With a full duffle bag over his shoulder, Billy couldn’t take a quiet step. It seemed all octaves of groan and squeak were achieved as he descended, no matter how slow he took it. By the time he reached the bottom, he was in a rush. “If he didn't wake then, he won’t wake now.” Billy thought.

But presenting its own challenge was the door. Its hinges were stiff, yet attached loosely, clattering against its frame as Billy grabbed the door knob. The knob however resisted, his gloved hands slipping off the cold bronze. So he removed his gloves, dropped the duffle bag, and gripped the cold pommel.

With a cough, a rattle, and a shake of the entire household, the door opened.

With the last obstacle surpassed, Billy gathered his stuff and ran out the door.

When a shaft of cool air hit the back of his neck, Billy’s father’s eyes shot open.

By the time his father got up to close the door, Billy was already a block down the road.

The cold air burned Billy’s lungs as he ran with his duffle bag, its weight smacking against his back as his breath trailed behind him like a car’s exhaust. 

Since it was a school morning, he had to carry his heavy textbooks with him. Usually they wouldn’t be a problem since their regular ice rink was just at this road. But, after complaints from the neighbors, they had to seek an alternative. 

Billy reached the end of the street onto King’s Highway, the only road that lead to downtown Catuvella, the epicenter of the small coastal town, which was really just a rotary that marked the intersection of King’s Highway and the town’s only real commercial district, Main Street, and as of today the location of Billy and his friends new hockey rink. 

Now on King’s Highway, Billy was really starting to labour under the weight of his duffle bag. But upon seeing the frozen black pond that was their old Ice rink through the mulberry bushes, he knew he had only a half mile to go. He continued to glance over at their old stomping ground as he trudged along the highway, and he could still make out the etchings of past games between the makeshift goalposts. The spider-like nets hung on pairs of long rusty lead pipes, originally used for weirs out south that caught the seal-avoiding bait fish that’d become chum.

Billy could also see one of his friends, Mike, had already taken one of the nets to the new ice rink, so with their combined efforts, he thought, the second net could be freed. But Mike was nowhere to be seen, most likely busy with his sisters. Billy had little time, so he continued southwards down King’s Highway, making a mental note to apologize to Mike later for not helping him with the other net.

The contents of dufflebag clanked and rumbled as Billy ran, getting even heavier the closer he got to the town’s rotary. Now nearing his destination, he could see the spire of the town’s church jutting out of the horizon, marking the location of the new ice rink, and It’s spire wasn’t the only man-made obelisk spearing the sky. In the center of the rotary came the war monument, reassuring the blonde boy as he ran by that he was a minute from the church, and conveniently enough, his school too. Now on Main Street, he ran a bit faster now, so close to the rendezvous with his friends. He would have been there by now if it wasn’t for the strip of stores on the right side of Main Street just before the church that blocked access to the church's absolutely massive parking lot, hell. But for Billy it has always been like that with downtown Catuvella being a tourist trap, they made sure to pack and utilize every inch of it. There was A Boutique, a diner, a hair salon, a nail spa, an entry way for all the apartments capping the 2nd floors of this building, and finally, the smallest outfit along this vein of the town.

It was the most recent addition to the main building, with freshly painted shingles on its walls. Its dark interior was on full display by large glass windows. Above which hung a finely carved wooden sign that read “Renowned Furniture”. 

Finally past the first set of stores, Billy Arrived at at the church, taking a right down the road that led to the church’s parking lot. Billy nearly sprinted down the slightly sloped road that lead to the parking lot as he was about to see the new ice rink for the first time now that his view was no longer obstructed by storefronts and apartments. Billy was so excited that he forgot that he didn’t know where this new ice rink was, and upon reaching the bottom of the road and into the church’s parking lot, Billy slipped onto his ass, dropping his duffle bag as he went slipping across a sheet of ice. 

Luckily for Billy, the ice was about an hour old and sturdy enough to hold his weight as he slid across it. 

Billy finally came to a stop at the other end of the ice sheet, just where the concrete was dry again, and, As if on cue, skating past him was his friend Frank, his dreadlocks trailing from under his helmet as he skated by. 

“Hey hey hey Billy,” greeted Frank in his usual nasally tone.

“Hey hey hey Franky,” replied Billy as he got up, completely unfazed after nearly sliding more than a hundred feet across the frozen parking lot.
 
As Frank continued to skate around the new ice rink, Billy maneuvered off the ice and onto the frosted grass of the church’s lawn and on it, traveled up the length of the ice rink to where he dropped his duffle bag. When he was finally back at the other end of the parking lot, Billy carefully went back onto the ice sheet to where he had dropped his duffle bag. Once he was safely back on the church's lawn, Billy spotted another one of his friends, Roger, coiling a hose sourced from the back of the church. 

“Is it good?” Roger yelled. The small freshman eagerly awaiting Billy’s reply. He had been up for at least three hours earlier setting up this plan, or more specifically, ‘his’ plan, since he was the one who first suggested it due to him being the reverend’s son. 

“Yeah.” Billy said without looking at him as he pulled out his skates from under his school books in his duffle bag. Billy already knew the rink was good before he even saw it for Roger, shorter and younger than Billy and his other friends, would never waste an opportunity to prove himself to the gang. 

“Nothing like the natural stuff.” said Frank as he came to a halt on his skates and then looked at Frank. “But it is god given, and I will count my blessings.”

“Har har. Billy, was Mike behind you?”, said Roger as he tossed aside the hose coil and picked up his skates. 

“I didn’t see him, but he got one of the nets down from black pond. Probably stopped so he could make breakfast. ” answered Billy.

With skates, helmet and Stick equipped, Billy tossed his duffle bag onto the lawn and skated out onto the frozen pond. Finally out on the Ice with skates on, Billy could finally examine their new ice rink.

In the middle of the Rink, Billy took note of its slightly-off rectangular shape. The corner behind him reached the end of the church lawn. The corner in front of him was snug against a wall perpendicular to renowned furniture’s rear entrance. Unlike the front, visible billy was the interior. Glass cases, wooden floors and a desk illuminated by lights turned on by a yet unseen owner. 

“You cool just hitting pucks against the wall?", questioned Roger, excited to play hockey on his creation.

Billy was too busy looking at the store for the owner to answer him. Roger skated by and repeated the same question. Billy blinked, shaking his focus from the store, and finally answered Roger. “Yeah, you go first.”

With that, Roger darted around the ice, his smaller stature seeming to fit perfectly with the new rink letting him maneuver around the ice with ease. To Billy and Frank, though, the sheet was almost too small to have any real fun, but as they could clearly see this was not the case for Roger; A short boy learns to appreciate tight spaces. His yellow stained sweatshirt billowed as he skated back and forth, covering strides as large as 40 feet with ease as the puck hovered between his legs with every nudge of his stick. His friends watched on, rolling their eyes and pretending to check their watches to get the point across: “We don’t have all day.”

But Roger persisted, shifting across from one end of the rink to the other as fast as he could. Then he stopped and turned before the church, whacking the puck with his fullest force. But Roger missed and instead struck the ice so hard he caught cement, breaking his hockey stick in three and throwing the boy onto his back in a single movement, all the while the puck remained unmoved.

Frank and Billy dropped their hockey sticks and rushed over to help him up. As Frank helped Roger up, Billy Picked up what was left of the wooden handle, the largest of the broken pieces. Carved along the length of the aging wood were the names of previous owners, each one was crossed out except for the very last one. 

Billy read the list aloud; “Elijah... Jebediah...Luke...Ezekiel...Anthony...Roger.”
After reading out Roger’s uncrossed name, Billy blurted, “Christ, Raj, do you have anything for yourself?”

Roger angrily took the stick from billy and threw it into a leafless cherry tree in the church’s lawn. His face reddened in Pain and exhaustion, but when he turned to Billy’s, Roger only chuffed and patted his shoulder saying, “Yeah, friends like you.”

Billy smacked his arm. “Gay.”

Before Roger could think of a comeback, a crack and a thud raddled behind him, stealing his and Billy’s attention. Frank had taken the liberty to demonstrate a proper goal shot to the gray wall but left behind no mark on its bumpy surface.

“Let me try.” Billy came behind Frank and snatched the puck with the paddle of his hockey stick, as he did, though, something inside the furniture store caught his eye, and he slowly came to a stop, the puck between his legs, as he was enamoured with what he saw.

Behind the blue tinted glass, bobbing to a rhythm Billy could only guess about, swept a figure in a black hoodie. Their denim-covered hips went back and forth, only reaching half way down her ass to reveal tufts of orange fur that reflected the gleam of the birchwood floor she walked on. What looked like an orange bow bobbed atop their head, but a quick glance at her “unique” legs made Billy look again and realize it wasn’t a bow, but a pair of rabbit ears bound by a scrunchy. Billy was certain that they were ears, because he could see wires streaming from them down to a round walkman hooked to the girl, or at least he was hoping a girl, hooked on her belt over her rather thick posterior.

‘Tiger trooper,’ Billy thought, a historical name for anthros he learned from current history teacher. ‘I want to get her attention.’

He looked down and stared at the puck under his stick and then at the wall 20 feet ahead. And then it finally hit him. ‘I know how,’ he thought.

“Hey Billy!” Billy looked over his shoulder as Franky got his attention.“Excuse my preaching, but are you going to shoot-” Franky was interrupted by a sudden smack to the stomach by Roger to keep him from interrupting whatever Billy was planning.

‘Yeah.”’Billy thought to himself, his focus returning to the puck. ‘I think I’ll shoot.’

He turned and skated towards the church, giving the puck a few nudges. A slight maneuver to the left to reduce speed, then facing backwards he raised his stick and waited as the momentum carried him ever closer to the lawn. A second before his heels dug into the dirt, Billy gave the puck his hardest strike ever.

It flew. High. Headlevel of any adult NHL player, a foot above any highschooler in town, and any official referee witnessing the puck would’ve called foul.
It struck the wall adjacent to the store's entrance, bounced off in an arc as high as the base of the church’s spire, and then crashed through the furniture store’s glass.

A female shriek filled the air, and Billy only had one thought, ‘Oh shit.’

Franky, in a panic, bolted off the ice and across the church’s lawn, his skates still on, kicking up frozen clumps of grass and dirt. As he fled his right blade caught in an underground sprinkler, cracking the plastic head as he tripped. A stream of ice cold water burst upwards, soaking his skating boots.
Roger immediately went ass to ice and grabbed his laces. As he untied his laces Roger prayed. And oh did Roger pray. The reverend’s son called upon the lord with speed and enunciation that would impress even the most devout monk, and Roger held nothing back, apologizing for reading comics in the pews, pleading that he was trying his best to be a good kid, that he didn’t mean to use the lord’s supply of water to accidentally assist in property damage, and for the good lord above to not send the police as divine retribution.

Billy, on the other hand, took the time to confirm his hypothesis as he took in the prior screams, ‘Definitely a girl,’ he thought. Then the furniture store entrance opened and Billy could do nothing but stare, for out stepped the rabbit girl, and the first thing he noticed were her beautiful blue eyes, and how cute her buck teeth were as she cursed him out in a language he couldn’t wait to learn later on.

As Billy stood in awe of this furry beauty, Roger came up behind him and grabbed him by the shoulder. Though BIlly was still in a haze about the bunny girly, the blonde boy managed to make out his friend’s comments as Roger pulled him toward the store; “Christ, you made that puck Ricochet like a bullet, Billy.”

Bullet. Billy.

‘What a cool nickname; He thought, as he was dragged by an apologetic Roger towards the screaming rabbit woman.

‘Maybe she’ll like it.’
 
===| Chapter 2 ===


The pile of blankets inside the cop car snorted when the radio cracked to life. “Williams, Williams. This is dispatch, over.”

Emerging from the blankets was Officer Williams. He groggily threw the sheets into his passenger seat, and with baggy eyes he looked for the microphone, then grabbed it from under the emergency break. “This is Williams, come back dispatch.”

“Yeah we got a call concerning conflict between locals and a new tenant. Head to main street parking and sort that out.”

“Roger that dispatch, on my way.,” replied Officer Williams

Letting the mic slip from his skeletal fingers to the floor, Williams turned the car on. Hot air burst from the fans and melted away the rime against his windshield. Its engine hummed and carried over the trees, disturbing sleeping starlings into flight.
Two minutes later and the vehicle was in reverse, leaving her nook behind the rust-chipped weather dome that he napped by. One three-point-turn, and he started down the winding forest and onto Seaside Road, a route connecting the abandoned weather dome to King’s Highway as it ran along the entire north and east sides of the Catuvella Peninsula. Trees gave way to sand dunes, dressed by man-planted grasses in checkerboard formation. With a bump, the dirt road under the wheel transitioned to pavement, passing a rotting wooden sign that read ‘Webbs Causeway Nature Reserve as Williams turned on his sirens and accelerated, ’

In five minutes, the cruiser was already coming down the church’s driveway, paying no mind to the ice on the parking lot. It broke easy under the cruiser’s wheels, and the rink’s creator didn’t notice. He was too preoccupied trying to talk to a giant cursing rabbit.

Williams,  yawning, mumbled “of fucking course its an anthro.” 

The lanky man stepped out of the car, barked some orders at the boys, and fifteen minutes of explanations and excuses from the boys flew by. Then he walked over to the rabbit girl, still shaking with anger, and got her side of the story.

“So...Miss...?”

“Dagger.” She answered, looking up at his large forehead. “Mein full name is Elisabeth Dagger, Hofficer.”

Williams clicked the pen in his left hand. “Miss Dagger, how do I spell that?”

Elizabeth spelled out her first and last name, ear twitching every time she had to correct a mispronunciation. She didn't do the same with her middle name for he hadn’t asked yet. She thought the officer would ask though, and clenched her fists in preparation. Her arms twitched as she anxiously stared at his notebook despite not being tall enough to see anything he wrote.

“Alright, thank you.” Williams clicked his pen a few times. The rabbit girl breathed a quick sigh of relief, her arms going still. The cop looked her over, from her footpaws to ears, then over to the three boys lined up in front of the grey wall adjacent to the now damaged store front.

‘Vat is he doing?’ Elizabeth thought, forcing her dainty muzzle to frown as facial muscles were more naturally inclined to show a slight content smile. She was stressing her disappointment, hoping to pressure the police man into doing something; anything other than have her wait. She had waited enough for several lifetimes already.

When the policeman didn’t acknowledge her frown, Elizabeth instead looked at the boys and thought. “Vat is he thinking?”

Franky, The tallest one, shook in his wet boots.
“Scheisse.“ Elizabeth thought to herself. “Scared by nozing.”

Her eyes shifted to the left of Franky, passing over Roger. She didn’t think anything of him as he prayed towards the ground.

No, it was Blonde one at the end that really got her pistons firing.

She wanted Billy to be the one shaking, to be the one praying. She wanted him to be punished! Persecuted to the fullest extent of the law and given the strongest sentence possible!

Interrupting her internal tempest, came a beeping from officer Williams’ wristwatch. He pulled back his fleece’s sleeve and clicked a button before saying “About time.”

“Hofficer?” She said. But before the officer could answer, her ears twitched to a familiar sound, coming far off behind the furniture store and past the rotary, the ringing of the highschool late bell.

“Hmm?” Williams realized he had blanked out staring at the watch.

“So vat are yu going to do about see boys?” Elizabeth asked.

“Miss Dagger, these boys are late for class.”

To this, roger slapped the jacket-covered stomachs of his friends beside him and pointed at the two conversing adults.

“The teacher’s will punish them harshly enough. The more we preoccupy them, the greater chance they flunk school and persist in being a nuisance to society.” Said the Williams, holding back a yawn.

“Vat is how yu’re going to punish them? Public education?”

“Now I did not say that!” Williams turned to face the boys. “Preacher’s son, dreadlocks, step up here.”
Frank and Roger walked over to the officer, shaking as they stood before him.

“I expect you two to settle this matter without involving me. Confess to your parents what happened with the sprinkler and go from there.”

No longer being detained, Roger and Franky celebrated with a fistbump.

“Now get to class!” Williams pointed his thumb over his shoulder, and the teenagers ran off.

The officer’s attention shifted to Billy. “Come here, bright eyes.”

The blonde young man stepped forward and looked the officer in the eye. Billy did not intend to be Disrespectful but Williams was too tired for mercy. “Look down!”

Billy obeyed.

“Now.” Williams ripped a couple pieces of paper out of his notebook. He scribbled his name, number and badge on the first sheet, and then handed it to Elizabeth along with a blank sheet and the pen. “Miss Dagger, write down your home address, home number, and business number.”

“Hofficer?” Her left ear and raised with her eyebrow.

“Now,” demanded the Officer.

“On vat am I supposed to write sis?”

“On the damn ground!,” he exclaimed

The lapine surveyed the ground, making sure she wasn’t going to kneel on any glass shards or pieces of sharp ice. On her knees she began to write what was asked.

Williams was enjoying the sudden rush of power. He went back to facing the boy, hands behind his hips. As the officer looked at Billy, his drill sergeant power fantasy, nursed from thousands of hours daydreaming on the job bubbled to light from Williams subconscious. “Now, Mr Wolcott, if that is your name. I do not want to waste time dragging your sorry ass to court over a flimsy destruction of property charge!”

“Vat?” Elizabeth sputtered. She struggled to keep her focus on making her number legible. It was difficult, writing on paper against her furry thighs.  

Billy, adrenaline pumping through his veins, felt the urge to smile, especially when he heard William’s idea of a punishment.

“You are going to report, after school, every day, and even on weekends if necessary, until this hear young-” The officer bit his tongue and looked at the rabbit. “...does’ enough business to work off the money necessary to pay for a new window.”

The pen slipped from the rabbit girl’s fingers onto the cold ground, after she heard what was said
“Am I making myself clear?” Bellowed the police officer.

“Crystal!” Answered Billy.

“Good.” Williams said satisfied, and noting to himself to bring a movie player on his next patrol so rewatch full metal jacket.

Miss Dagger got off the ground and brushed gravel off her thighs. Williams then snatched the paper and pen from her, then handed them along with another blank sheet to Billy. “Now keep this as a method to contact her. And write down your number and address on this blank.”  

When the contact information was exchanged, Williams reacquired his pen, and then started for his car. Opening the door, he yelled “We settle things a little differently in this world, Miss Dagger. Have a good day.”

The rabbit girl didn’t give a reply. Her mind was still struggling to process Billy’s ‘punishment.’
The young man in question, meanwhile, was now standing beside her, in a similar state of disbelief.

Just as the police cruiser turned onto mainstreet and zoomed away, miss Dagger shook her head.

“So vat? I supposed to vait until hes out of school for sis glass to be cleaned?” She said, as if the cop was still there. Turning towards the shattered remains of Reknowned Furniture’s rear, Elizabeth paid no mind to her new human employee.

“Nozing matders in sis world.” Her eyes turned skywards. Overhead, against the overcast clouds, a starling flew.  “Nozing.”

Behind her coughed Billy, “Sorry for destroying your business.” He removed his gloves and offered a handshake. “I hope I can make it up to you.”

The rabbit snorted, scrutinizing naked skin of his fingers. Pink from the winter cold, like smaller, more precious, digits she saw in a different life. Yet, these were callused, firm. She didn't feel the desire to protect these. She took his hand and gripped it hard.
“Yu Betder.”
 
===| Chapter 3 ===
 
 
When the end of the day bell rang, and all four boys met at the rear exit, Billy made the call; They would go to The Sweet Spot and purchase enough snacks to last their inevitable house arrest. Mikey was brought up to speed by Roger, who kept stumbling over his words out of mixed excitement and anger.

“Its just one dumb string of dumb luck after another!”

“Yeah.” Mikey said while brushing scarlet hair out of his eyes. He was more focused on when to get a haircut while babysitting than his short friend’s complaints.

“Between your neighbors and that rabbit lady,” Roger eyed his father’s episcopal church, across the street. “They can all suck a bag of dicks.”

“Or a bag of carrots.” Frank nudged Bill in the side as they trudged ahead of Mikey and Roger. “Ay?”

“Huh?” Billy blinked a couple times. He returned the nudge with a chuckle. “Oh, fuck you.”

“Ow! Ow! Hey man I’m just saying- Ow! I wouldn’t mind finding her in my garden patch.”

After delivering an onslaught of shoulder punches, Billy rubbed his thumb against his fingers. “She had paw pads on her fingers.” He thought, staring at his naked hands. The afternoon sun made it hot enough for gloves to remain in his bag. “Soft, like powdered sugar.”
Two women exited The Aberdeen cloth store a block from where the boys were heading. Their arms weighed down by glossy red bags sporting winter ware. Where they walked they occupied most of the sidewalk. Frank, worn from his mock-beating, took behind Billy as they formed a single file line. Mike, seeing the women pass, ran ahead to Billy.

“Guys, can we be quick? I don’t want to leave my sisters alone for long.”

Billy and his train of thoughts stopped. A challenge? He shifted his duffle bag from his side into a fireman's carry, and yelled “Last one there has to pay!” before running. He was followed close by the redhead, then a few meters behind was Roger, and then finally Frank.

From Aberdeen’s, the Sweetspot was a five minute run. And only that long because of traffic from cars and pedestrians alike. The boys couldn’t have complained. They’d lived here for fifteen years, known fifteen summers when the town was so stuffed, traffic stood still. When the car exhaust overruled the smell of kettle corn roasting in a cart that now, in the winter, was covered in a tarp and set beside the candy store entrance. When radios blaring and complaints from drivers and jay walkers alike blocked the tranquil ding of the entrance bell. The very bell that ringed as they stepped into the Sweet Spot.

“Hello squirt.” There was Dac, leaning over the cash register, addressing his brother’s late entrance. He was like an older mirror image of Frank, though with short black hair and a longer face.  “What’s the rush?”

Panting and wheezing, Frank sauntered up to the counter and motioned for a drink of water. When he got nothing, he coughed and slapped the marble counter. “Dac, I need a favor.”

“Shoot.”

“Really?” He straightened his back so quick his dreadlocks bounced. “Why?”

“Just tell me what you want first.”

Frank slapped the counter again, making a weight scale rattle. “I need to pay for all of their candy but I don’t have my wallet.”
“Okay retard.” Dac motioned to his little brother to come closer. “I’m not coming home Friday night. Mom and Dad ask, say I stayed after work to check inventory, maybe fell asleep. Deal?”

“Deal.”

The boys had already gotten their goods and formed a line. Mikey was first, a pound bag of penny candy held in both hands. He made a sound to let Franky know he was in a hurry, shaking the bag back and forth so it sounded like waves crashing on a beach.
Billy didn’t put half a mind towards picking out his candy. He chose to fill a bag with circus peanuts. Against his digits they were almost as soft as her, maybe too squishy, too easy to break. They were orange too, exact shade as her fur. And that smell as they were torn in half. He couldn’t have smelled her. The air was too cold, and there was too much distance. And he didn’t want to, that’d be creepy. But the smell of marshmallows and peaches, an aroma of soft and sweet. That summarized the idea of her to him perfectly.
“Hey Buddy you gonna let me weigh that or what.” Said Dac.

Her voice wasn’t that bad either, he thought. Her accent was cute, really cute what with her being angry. Did she sound cute when she was happy? Or when she was trying to be romantic?

Roger poked Billy’s shoulder. “Hey so you didn’t explain, how did you get away from the police?”

The blonde boy then had a realization.

Mikey was already opening the door when he was nearly knocked over. “Hey I thought you were running back with me?”
“Sorry man.” He knew he could then ask for forgiveness if he had a good excuse. Because tomorrow they’ll be happy to hear his explanation. “I got a date!”

But Elizabeth was not forgiving, and not happy, but not present to hear his excuse.

Taped against the entrance of Renowned Furniture, in black ink on red construction paper:
“ Closed to public. Stupid boy take back entrance.”

“I’m not stupid.” Billy pressed his face against the glass, peering into the poorly lit interior. No rabbit women in sight. He did notice how the door thumped with his touch, and discovered that it opened with ease. “You’re the one who didn’t lock the front door.”
The skin on the back of Billy’s neck stubbled with goose bumps as he stepped into the frigid studio. It was much, much colder than outside, as vents over head hissed conditioned air. He reached behind to unzip his bag, and then dropped it. Against the pale of the birch floor the bag thumped, and from it Billy got his gloves and a red wool beanie.

His heart ached seeing the hat, a gift from a birthday that seemed to be another life. A gift he really didn’t like, feeling like he was being treated like he was half his current age. An attitude that he had regretted a week after his birthday.

But now as Billy put it on, he didn’t mind. It would keep him warm, and maybe that lapine woman would find it cute.

As he donned the gloves, the blonde boy took note of his surroundings. The storefront was twice as long as it was wide, with less room to move with how stuffed it was with furniture. To his left, stacked on top of a desk, two ottomans, one upside down atop the other, with tiger stripe cushions. To his right was a bookcase that touched the ceiling, lined with burnt leather books and backed against some stacked end tables. Not four feet lay between the ottomans and the case, creating a little hallway that led past more furniture. Sofas stacked on their side that reeked of an old woman’s home. And a wooden file cabinet bronze locks flickering as Billy walked in front of the light they reflected. All leading to a flight of spiral stairs piercing the store’s center.

Billy looked up, and saw tufts of a pink carpet poking out from the next room above. Her room, he thought before heading in the opposite direction.

He walked lightly down the steps of the forged staircase, more of the basement revealing itself. A bookcase to the left. A chest to the right. And far to the front of the store, bent over, that rabbit woman whom Billy had pissed off not nine hours before.
Her ass was high in the air, tail like a fluff pyramid dedicated to the rolling hills below. An ass which seemed to want to burst forth from its denim bonds. An ass that was to Billy so fucking fluffy that not even jean shorts could contain the cushions within. Tufts of fur poking out past the hem and waste like waving hands from a leaving cruise ship past, beckoning Billy to come aboard for a soft snuggle, to undo her belt and press his face between her two large, fluffy-

Elizabeth grunted as her paws gripped the plywood board, and with a wiggle of her tail she heaved it up. Then with a sigh she pressed it between two other boards nailed against the wall. One hand holding the board, she reached for the hammer on the floor. Then she saw Billy, and barked “Help me!”

The boy ran over and propped up the wood while the rabbit nailed it against its siblings.

“Yu are late.”

Billy’s eyes were to ground, her thighs against his peripherals. “I needed a snack.”

“Yu can eat aftder vork. As revord.”

She nudged herself between him and the wood to finish nailing the bottom, her ears brushing against his nose and mouth. He lifted his head and exhaled, making her velvet ribbons twitch “Stop sat.”

Billy inhaled before holding his breath, catching her aroma in the process. Like cinnamon and vanilla.

“Was this a weird way to learn how she smelled? She did press against me...” he thought.

As she finished up the carpentry job, Billy’s mind moved towards small talk. “So, you live on the top floor?”

“Ja.” She moved out from under him, and he realized he didn’t have to keep holding the board. “Yu go in?”

“No, I just saw the pink carpet.”

“Gud.” Elizabeth dropped the hammer, and sauntered over to a bottle of water. She walked with a grace that Billy enjoyed, a cadence that gave her hips a slight side to side sway. A natural stride, an adaptation to the offset weight afterwards formed after years of experience. Or maybe it was taught. Billy hoped she didn’t have any ex-boyfriends.

“So, where’d you get the furniture?” He asked.

Wiping water from her wet lips, the rabbit cocked an eyebrow at Billy. “Vat?”

“All of it upstairs looks really old.” He rubbed his chin and looked around, pantomiming an investigator he remembered from the movies. “And this stuff too. It's all dusty antiques.”

Elizabeth took a second to process what he said, and then smiled. “Ja, dusty Handiques.”

Setting the water down, she disappeared upstairs for a minute, and then reappeared with a devilish. Like waving a wand made of a fox’s tail she revealed a duster from behind her back. “Dust sem so sey arh just Handiques.”

And so Billy took the duster, smiling politely, and started on a nearby rectangular display case. There was a rug of smutz along the glass so thick it was like a brick of unkempt steel wool, catching the duster every time he swiped it against the glass. “This is fucked.” He picked at the fuzzy mass. “Why’d you let it get so bad Eliza?”

“Say vere in schtorage for years!” She pranced over and handed a spray bottle and rag. “Und mein name is Elisabeth! Not Elisa.”

He got to work digging the hairy crust off the glass case. The first swipe of grime revealed dark blues and light greens in a porous blob next to a brown hulk. The next cleared away enough for more details to come through; The light green was shaped like a sabre, The brown hulk also attached to a yellowish hulk. Working away the dust with tight circular motions of his hand, Billy was finally able to make out what was inside that case.

Painted on a piece of driftwood two feet long, a map of Webbs Island, the date of 1740 etched into the corner and filled in with red wax. To its left, a miniature of a tall ship, carved out of wood and placed on a bronze plaque which read “Jasmine’s Thirst.”

“Hey, this is cool stuff.” Billy said, admiring his handy work as much as the items of interest. “Where’d it come from?”

“I halready said.”  Elizabeth stood beside him cross armed, like a parent looking down on her child, though she was the same height as him if not shorter if her ears didn't count.

“Yeah, but why did you store it? And where did you get it before?”

The rabbit girl sighed and walked towards the staircase, giving him another nice view of her well shaped rump. Billy followed her up and to the front exit.

“If yu...” She turned on her heel towards him and stabbed a claw into the puffed flannel of his jacket. “ come here tomorrow. On time. Vith ein desire to lisden to orders... I vill hexplain.”

“But for now, yu must go. Your stunt drained me of energy and I vant early sleep.”

Out the door Billy walked, duffle bag in arms, silk-smooth rabbit voice at his back. “Goodnight. Don’t be late again.”

“Night.” He whispered, not sure if the cold he felt was how he treated her or the outside. The door closed behind him and echoed over the cool air. The clear sky had given way to overcast, and sunset approached ever near. As he walked northeast towards home, street lamps buzzing to life all along the King’s Highway, the boy reflected.

“Even though I fucked her window, she didn’t seem that angry.” He turned when he passed Mikey’s house, where both goals on black pond were now without nets. “Maybe she’s forgiven me. Or it wasn’t that big of a deal. Or maybe I did a really good job at work.”

He reached the block of his house, walked up the broken seashell path to his front door, and removed his gloves. As he opened the door his father greeted him from the couch. “Anything new?”

Billy stopped at the first step and dug around his mind for words to say.

“Nah.”

Then he continued up the stairs, down the hallway and to his bedroom.

“Maybe she doesn’t think I’m worth the effort.” Changing into his pajamas, Billy saw his young face in the mirror. “Maybe she’ll just tell me I don’t have to work for her any more since I’ve done enough to pay for the window.”

Scrutinizing his visage, Billy felt less confidence in himself then he had before going into that furniture store. “Maybe this is a waste of time.”

And then he remembered the size of the rump on that rabbit.

He licked his palm and pretended to slick back a macho man’s mullet where his buzz cut currently existed. Sticking a finger gun towards himself, he proclaimed. “Time spent ogling ass is never time wasted. Maybe everything will turn out just fine.”


===| Chapter 4 ===


The clock in the classroom read 2:00pm.

“Mister Callaghan, do you have a question?”

Mike whipped forward and clasped his hands. “No, Mister Young.”

“If you do, it’s alright to ask me.” The aforementioned Mister Young tapped a meter stick against his freshly shined leather s. “I’m sure I have a better answer than Mister Wolcott.”

A minute of silence passed. Mr. Young stared at the red haired teen. Mike stared back, smiling, thinking how similar the teachers nose was to a halfpipe.

“Very well."

The teacher turned to point at a map unraveled against the chalkboard, wiggling his bushy eyebrows. “So who can remember why the French coined the phrase ‘tiger troopers’?”

A ghostly white-skinned girl raised her hand. “Because Tiger Anthros were picked by the Spanish to wave their flags.”

“Correct, this was during the thirty years war...” Mr Young pointed at the world map and rubbed his index finger between Germany and France.  “As the militaries of Europe grew, it became necessary for the emergent anthropomorphic population to be utilized.”

And so the lesson resumed, and after five minutes, Mister Young was lost in his world and Mikey saw a chance to resume conversations.
“So the cop said you had to help her?”

Billy dropped his pencil, having taken the lecture to finish a drawing on the inside of his notebook. “Yep.”

“So that was your date?”

The blond sucked on the bottom of his lip and looked away. “Yeah.”

Mike snorted and seemed to Billy to focus on learning rather than Billy’s search for love. So he took to shading in the doodle, a caricature of Elizabeth toting cake and a gameboy colour while in lingerie.

“So is she hot.”

Frills and doily patterns spiraled around the rabbit’s panties. “Yeah.”

“You sure you’re not just into bestiality.”

The eraser top bounced off the back of Mikeys’ head. He chuckled and cracked his neck.

“So what makes her hot then?”

Mr Young rolled up the map, and wrote on the board “Rocroi - Tigress Captain - Page 91.” His eyes grazed over the students, making sure they were checking their books. For a second he focused on Mike and Billy. Then another student asked a question, and Mr Young’s attention wasn’t on the boys.

“She’s got a huge ass.”

“How huge.”

Billy waited for his friend to look over his shoulder, and then demonstrated with his hands. The red head chuffed and smiled. “But do the drapes match the carpet?”

He took a second to process the statement, and then asked “what?”

“How’s her tits?”

Doodle Elizabeth’s massive mammaries were smudged away by an eraser worned down to its metal parts. “She’s pretty flat.”

“Darn.”

Mr. Young pulled down the map again, eyes drifting again to stare at the two boys at the far back.

“Why?”

“What?”

Billy finished adjusting his illustration of the rabbit with accurately sized breasts. “What’s wrong if she’s got small boobs?”
“I mean, nothing.”  Mike scratched his chin. “I guess they’ll grow when you impregnate her.”

The pencil fell out of the blonde’s hands onto the ground.“Ech”

“What?”

Billy leaned over and picked up his writing utensil. His eyes shifted out the window to his left, where a starling perched on a branch outside.

“I’m fucking fifteen, man.”

“If you want to be a man...” The ginger bent to the left and tied his shoe, giving him a chance to look his friend in the eye. “You got to think about that stuff.”

The starling bounced from one end of the branch towards the tree trunk. Mister Young was asked if any tiger troopers visited their town in the olden times. He scratched his chin, assured the question-asker that the answer was on the tip of his tongue, and consulted his textbook. The rest of the class took this chance to talk amongst one another.

“Besides.” With more people talking, Mike felt safe enough to raise his voice. “Imagine you as a father.”

Billy raised his voice as well. “Hey fuck you.”

“You would make a great Tv show. Not even 16 and a father.”

“I’m not sure I’d like to make a baby with her! I just find her hot.”

“Mister Wolcott!”

The class went silent. The startling stopped on its branch. Mike slumped in his chair. All eyes were on Billy.

“Would you come to the front of the class?”

Every thought of the boy’s was fear. The chair screeched as it scraped against the classroom floor. He walked forward, each step echoing in his mind. As he passed his friend, for a quick glance Billy thought  he saw “sorry” mouthed but not said.
He reached the front of the classroom, standing before Mr. Young, wielding the meter stick like a dictator’s whip.

“Repeat what you said.”

Billy hesitated, peering at his seat. Mike sliced a thumb across his throat.

“Mister Wolcott, as this is the last period, we don’t. have. all. day.”

Billy coughed, took a deep breath, and repeated what he had said. “ I’m not sure I’d like to make a baby with her. I just find her ... hot.”

It was silent again.

And then someone laughed.

And then the whole class laughed.

From the first goody two shoes on the front left corner to the pair of buffoons in the corner behind Mikey, they all laughed.
And Billy felt the most foolish he had felt in forever.

“That does not sound like the history of anthros.” Mister young commented. “Please go back to your seat, Mr Wolcott.”

Billy obliged.

Just as he was about to sit down again, the teacher said “And, Mister Wolcott, please see me after class.”

The boy sulked against his chair, slipping down until the back of his neck was against his back rest. He wanted to crawl inside something and hide until everyone in the room was dead and his loud mouth was forgotten.

“Anyways, class, thanks to Miss Colt’s question, your homework is research.” The bushy-browed man erased the blackboard and wrote down instructions. “Look into the history of our town and bring me back a paragraph describing one notable person you found.”

Mike whipped behind him and uttered a quick apology, but wasn’t heard over Mister Young saying “Bonus points if this citizen is an anthropomorphic. ”

Though his pride was still hurt, Mr. Young’s instructions made the boy lit up. Elizabeth did seem to like that history stuff.  Billy could ask about her ancestors, get to know more about her, and even get closer to her.

Maybe even close enough to grab that ass...

 As Billy fell back into daydreaming, the starling began to dance on the branch once again.
 
The watch read 3:27, exactly 57 minutes after school ended. 47 more minutes than Elizabeth expected for Billy to get there. But this watch wasn’t on either boy or rabbit mentioned. Instead, it was on the railing in the bell tower of the Episcopal Church. Roger’s eyes bore into it, his hands wrapped around the rope attached to the bell. “3:28....” He whispered.

Down below the leafless trees swayed as the wind howled. The eastern gust was frigid, and Roger felt it through his gloves and life-preserver-like coat. “Fuck.” He squeezed the rope, itching to tug it already. “Come on, 3:29...”

To the west, coming from the parking lot, a large white van pulled up the driveway. It stopped to signal a left turn, and the sudden movement and its colorful logo caught Roger’s eye. ‘Abernaphy Glass’ read the logo, red letters circling a woodpecker, its mouth agape. Then the van drove into its turn towards the rotary, taking the third exit and leaving Roger’s sight.

“They probably repaired that rabbit bitches’ glass.” Roger’s brown pupils came to rest on the side of Reknowned Furniture.   “Goddamn. If it weren’t for her I wouldn’t be in this mess!”

He spaced out staring at the store wall, revisiting yesterday morning in his mind. Since that incident he had not only lost another place on which to play hockey. Roger had lost privilege of playing with his friends after school, his father coming up with busy work as punishment. The only option now was to wake up early before his father or siblings, and head out to play. But they would need a place that was close to all of their houses. Close enough where it would take little time to get there, and then once they’re done playing, get to class.

As Roger pondered, Billy Wolcott came running from the school, crossing two streets to bypass the rotary.

“Oh hey, Billy! Billy!” Roger called out to his friend. Maybe they could hammer out an idea right now and scout tomorrow before school, he thought.

But Billy didn’t do so much as look in the church’s direction before opening the store’s entrance and disappearing.

“Ah well.” Thought the reverend’s son. “I’ll catch him tomorrow.”

Then Roger heard his father yelling, realized it was 3:35, and tugged the rope quickly.
 
When Elizabeth took a seat on the crate, the church bell next door had begun to ran. But the rabbit lady didn’t pay it any mind.
Boot scuffs and mud trails crisscrossed the floor surrounding her.  Beneath new windows, splinters and twisted nails littered the windowsill. A cool breeze came through the rear entrance, the glass door currently taken roped against the wall outside.

Abernathy Glass, in their efforts to make the job easy, took the door off its hinges. But they broke the hinges, and the pneumatic closer, and had scratched both the door and the frame. Rather than informing the German accented rabbit, who was already high strung when they had arrived, they made a swift egress once the windows were installed.

Luck was on their side. Elizabeth didn’t care to stop them about the door. She was too busy ripping into the delivery men, complaining about how late they were,  criticizing their poor customer support, tarnishing their very names until they dropped the wooden crate where they stood, leaving the store without so much as a goodbye.

A crate that was too heavy for the petite rabbit woman to lift.

Elizabeth enjoyed the breeze that blew in. It was the only thing about her new home she enjoyed. The air was either cold, or wind blew enough to make it cold.

Of course, it wasn’t the same type of cold that snow brought. Snow, that reminded her of times which ceased since her unexpected arrival to that seaside town.

Elizabeth hung her head and sighed, her ears drooping close enough to her mouth the onrush of air covered up the sound of Billy’s entrance.  

“Hello! Sorry I’m late!”

The rabbit girl winced as she mentally prepared herself to deal with the boy, thinking of how to get the best use of him.
“Wow, what the hell happened here?”

Elizabeth didn’t answer him. She jumped her plump rump off the box and motioned him over. “Grab ze mop. I do not vish to step in mud any more.”

Billy obeyed, or at least he was excited to follow her orders. He spent a minute standing still, looking for the mop until she pointed at it behind the counter.

He dragged the filled bucket out from its hiding space, sploshing water here and there and then had to go back and wipe up the puddles he created. All in silence, as he thought of the best way to start a conversation.

“So, sorry for being late again.”

Elizabeth picked up a nail that sat on her windowsill, paying him no mind.

“My teacher, Mister Young, cool guy. He gave me this homework, right.”

She rolled the rusty nail in her pad-tipped fingers.  The brief thought of crucifying the delivery men from earlier came over her mind. She dismissed it as cruel and time consuming.

“Yeah it was such an important task he had to keep me after class, and that's why I’m late.”

The bag jingled as Elizabeth dropped the last nail into it.

“See, he wants us to research past people who have lived in town, and that got me thinking...”

As he spoke he watched her walk by, approving of her salmon-pink sailcloth shorts. A complimentary third color to her white and gold tail, which disappeared as she turned to point at his feet.

“Boy!” Elizabeth pointed at his feet. “Vat ar yu doing?”

Billy made a puddle mopping the same square foot for the past five minutes. A roll of paper towels sailed by his head and hit the wall behind him. “Clean sat up, sen ve shall move dis crate.”

On his knees, the boy continued. “How long have you lived on cape?”

“Vat?”

Billy repeated the phrase in a slow manner. “How long have you lived on cape?” She repeated in the same tone. “Vat?”

He rubbed the entire roll of paper towels against the puddle, a little annoyed. “How long have you lived in Catuvella?”

“Four years.” Elizabeth dropped the rucksack full of nails on her counter. Turning towards the crate, which was as tall as her hips, and by proxy the boys’ as well since they were the same height, and decided she was going to move it now. “Come here.”

“Are you descended from any tiger troopers?” The sopping roll of paper towels was left behind as Billy came to stand before the wooden box. “Or are you one...”

“Stand here, und prepare to lift.” She ordered, pointing at the side of the box farthest from the stairs.  “Ready...go!”

Up and off the ground Billy lifted his side, making no noise other than deep breaths. But his lapine employer groaned and grunted, almost panting as she struggled to hold the box. “Follow...me...” She hissed through grit teeth.

Five minutes and they were halfway up the spiral staircase. Though the box was heavy, it was interesting enough that he didn’t mind the weight. Orange packing stickers littered the crate, showing that the box had been moved before a lot. He recognized the area codes printed on them from writing letters to pen pals in middle school. Boston, New Bedford, Bristol, places out west, off cape past the canal. Dense, urban cities, poor in some respects, but appreciative of the time for which Elizabeth’s knick-knacks all came from. Billy wondered if maybe she was from the Museum of Fine arts. Maybe he was out of her league, he worried. Maybe she preferred an educated scholar, or a hardy punk over a hockey-playing brat.

The rabbit girl gasped. “Ar yu paying hattention?”

When he realized she was talking to him he stuttered. “Uh yeah! I’m giving this all my focus.” To emphasize his point, he peered around the edges and corners two or three times. In doing so, he noticed something.   A small black stamp against the grain of the wood, almost small enough to read, but recognizable. It was nothing more than a name surrounded by a box in black ink.

Dovin-Basil.

Billy stopped walking and Elizabeth’s grip slipped as she tugged against the non-moving blond and crate. Billy found himself teetering at the top of the stairs as all the weight of the box coupled with the gravity pressed against his back. His hands slid along the rough edges of the crate, catching splinters and cuts as the rectangular prism shifted further up, or rather down as he bent backwards, towards his chest and neck. In an act of pure adrenaline, Billy lifted with all his strength and threw the box over head, catching himself on the railing to avoid a somersault down the stairs.

The crate soared over the railing and landed with a crunch on the hardwood a story below.

“Boy!”

The rabbit girl shoved past him, speed walking down the stairs to come before the crate. It was in the same condition before he dropped it. Perhaps smoother where Billy’s hands sanded themselves against its splinter covered-edges.

But no doubt, if she had the energy to lift the box, Elizabeth would find the falling wooden crate had scratched the basement floor.

“Sis never vould have happened if vu hadn’t come here late!” She yelled at the boy as he sat on the staircase catching his breath. “Tomorrow if yu dont come in time, I vill call yur parents, I vill tell sem vat happened yesterday und I vill see yu in so much trouble! Scheisse!”

So mad was she that she stomped her foot-paws against the floor. Billy, looking down on her, was part amused, part terrified at how her ears twitched. And then she yelled.

“Now go! Leave! Go! Go! Scheisse!”

And without so much as a goodbye, Billy ran.  Up the stairs, through the storefront, out the door, and heading home along the King’s Highway. He didn’t stop to take a look at his hands, his palms and especially his pointer embedded with wood. He didn’t stop to catch his breath,his chest pounding as the adrenaline screamed through his veins. He didn’t stop even when he started to feel the stress, like a vice grip squeezing behind his eye sockets, as the same few thoughts raced through his head.

“I fucked up! She hates me! If I fuck up again I’m dead! I’ve ruined my chances with her! I fucked up! She hates me! I’ve ruined my chances with her! I fucked up! She hates me! I’ve ruined my chances!..” and so on, his thoughts only slowing as he turned down the street to his house.

“She hates me...I shouldn’t have talked to Mike in class. I shouldn’t have been late. I shouldn’t have fucked around when I was supposed to mop the floor. I should’ve stopped fucking around with the box.”

The box. That stamp. A familiar name whose echo started at the back of Billy’s cranium and enveloped every thought as he trudged north. Dovin-Basil. Dovin-Basil. Dovin-Basil. He relived an experience he thought he had gotten over. Something that could’ve happened a lifetime ago when actually it was last year. Something that was actually everything and now meant nothing as every thought of regret, guilt, depression and angst smashed into one single bout of melancholy and then, apathy. Emotional overexertion turning to exhaustion. And then nothing.

Billy came to a stop in front of his house, thoughtless.

He took a deep breath, tried to remember what he had been thinking, then stopped in his tracks again. Halfway to his door.
“Okay you know what...” He raised his hands, the strap of his duffle bag chafing over his shoulder. “I...Nothing can get worse.”
The front door of the Wolcott house opened. Billy’s dad was standing in the doorway, belt in his hand.

“What’s this call I got from your History teacher?”

===| Chapter 5 ===


Billy rubbed his red ears as he stood before the mirror on the third floor bathroom of his school, the stinging pain still there from yesterday. 

“I’m going to Deadman’s pond,” announced Billy.

Roger stood next to him, tidying up his collar.

“Are you sure?” Roger said, pressing a zit he found on his nose. “If you think we should go there for hockey, I don't think it’d work. The time it’d take us-”

“I’m going once class is over,” interrupted Billy.

Roger’s zit popped as Billy spoke. A dribble of blood pooled down his forehead. He nabbed a paper towel and dabbed at the fresh wound. “Okay. Are we taking the dirtbikes?”

“Yes.”

“Good! Sweet.” When the blood stopped flowing, Roger threw the towel in the trash. 

The boys left the restroom, Roger following Billy for despite being a grade apart, their class schedules allowed for a “walk and talk” before class. 

Roger spoke, “the dirt bikes should both have full tanks, so we’ll be ready to head to Deadman’s pond once we get to your house.”
“Alright,” acknowledged Billy without looking in Roger's direction as he marched down the hallway, “I’ll be seeing you...”

Just before Billy ducked back into class, Roger abruptly stopped him with a hand on his shoulder. 

“Hey wait!,” Roger Exclaimed, “I’m grounded. I’m gonna need to call my dad when we get to your house. Can you give me an excuse? ”
Billy answered, “tell him you’re helping me at a job and you’re getting paid.”

Roger, now at ease, left for his class as Billy finally entered his.

A half an hour later, Billy was already at the front door of his house, opening it as slowly and as cautiously as possible as he entered. So quiet and dark was it inside that Roger jumped when he heard the door slam shut behind him.

“Quit fucking around Roger” Billy barked in a hush tone. “You know where the phone is. Go call your dad.”

Roger stepped around his blonde friend, and disappeared into the kitchen. Once Roger was out of sight, he let his mind wander aimlessly. Listening to the sound of his heart as his ears still winced pain.

Then Billy’s Father came through the front door and said “Hello.”

“Hello”, Billy responded, startled by his father’s sudden appearance.

The giant of a man walked past his son into the kitchen to get a beer, paying no mind to his son’s friend on the phone.
With beer in hand, Billy’s father returned to the living room where Billy was. “What are you guys doing?” 

“We’re taking the dirt bikes to Deadman’s pond,” declared Billy.

Mr. Wolcott Senior sipped his drink as stood in front of Billy. “Don’t you mean Honeymooner’s pond?”
“It’s Deadman’s pond, dad,” said Billy, staring at the fireplace.

A few more sips and Billy’s father responded, “now just because what happened happened doesn't mean we have to forget everything that's good. Changing names to dumb nicknames.”

The son paid little mind to his father, stepping past him toward the kitchen entrance.

“Billy,” called his father, stopping him just before the kitchen entrance.

“What dad?” Billy turned to see his father had sunk into the recliner with his drink.

“Don’t go out on the ice,” his father advised. The almost empty drink in his hand swished in its can as Mr Wolcott Senior shook it, looking at it instead of his son. “Please.”

The blond boy clenched a fist, his ears hurting once again. Rebellion stirred inside of him, and as he thought of a million ways to declare his independence as a young man, Roger took his attention with a tap to the shoulder.

“Let’s go. Dad says it's cool.” With that, Roger sped towards the front door, greeting Billy’s father on the way out, “Afternoon Mister Wolcott.”

“Afternoon Roger.” Replied the father, raising the can. “Say hello to the Reverend for me.”

And with that, the boys went to the garage, put on their goggles and fired up their dirt bikesThey rode and rode them to the curb of Billy’s house. Instead of taking a left on Billy’s road, which lead south towards kings highway, splitting Catuvella’s downtown from its boonies and heartland, and ran from Orc Harbor to Seaside road, the boys went north, a few blocks to the right of the Wolcotts house, where the street came to an end at a cul-de-sac, crowned by a dirt path walled by lobster traps stacked ten feet high. This path, dubbed the Root, bypassed some conservation forest and ran parallel to the old Catuvella cemetery before dumping the two boys at the abandoned east-west railroad. Beside the browned and rusted steel tracks the boys flew on their dirt bikes. Billy up front in his yellow model, Roger tailing in red as close as he could without eating a mouth full of frosted debris and gravel. With 250cc the boys reached their destination in no time at all, spotting the naturally formed c-shaped bump that led from the abandoned east-west railroad to Honeymoon forest, revving down before crossing it. The transition from dry dirt and gravel to sand and crushed leaves was smooth, and once they were over the hump and in Honeymoon forest they stopped their dirt bikes and walked them the last half mile before the pond.

The heat of the engine and the excitement of riding made Billy forget how cold it was. He only realized this when he wasn’t moving fast enough to see his breath fog in front of him.

“It's cold,” Billy exclaimed, enjoying the frigid air against his still-burning ears. “The ice will be thick when we get there.”

“Sweet.” Roger replied, lagging behind as he struggled to push the large machine. “Did you bring skates?”

“No,” answered Billy.

With crunching leaves and twigs underfoot, Billy was enjoying the serenity of the forest. His nerves calmed as the smell of rotting leaves and wet bark hit his nose. Soon, however, the clearing where Deadman’s pond lay came into view and the aroma changed. Now the crisp smell of naturally frozen fresh water hit the boys' nostrils, invoking visions of past hockey games at the frozen black pond. Upon reaching the sand-floored landing of the pond, they propped their bikes on its kickstands, and walked onto the ice.

“This is nice.” Billy said, staring at the ice beneath his feet.

“I know!” Roger took his goggles off and shoved them in his pocket. “Fuck man, I wish we brought our skates. It's like perfect over here by the beach.”

“Yeah,” responded Billy. 

However, for some reason unbeknownst to Billy, his thoughts shifted from the ice to something that lay beneath it. Not under where he stood but... somewhere else at the frozen pond. “Let's keep walking,” Billy said, mind still enamored on his sudden desire to know what lay beneath.

“Okay. We gonna measure the dimensions of the good stuff?” Roger pondered what sort of benefit he could make out from this trip. “Maybe we can come here on the weekends.”

“Yeah,” said Billy, but the blond boy was no longer thinking about hockey. “Maybe.”

He walked along the edge of the shoreline, tracing the kidney shaped body of water with Roger flanking by his right, always close to the beach. He didn’t pay any mind to the short boy’s suggestions concerning goals, sidelines and whatever little tidbit about playing frozen pond hockey he came up with. No, Billy’s mind was focused on the bottom of that lake. Thinking, pondering, hoping that maybe as he traced the edge of that pond once or twice he would see what he was looking for.

Instead he was suddenly overcome by sad memories from last year. Of TV dinners hastily put together by his sobbing father. Of lonely bedtimes when there was no one to barge in and pester him with kisses and jeers until he fought them back for treating him like a kid. Of waking up in the morning, expecting everything bad from last night to have just been a bad dream, only to go down the stairs and remember that this nightmare was not one you could wake up from.

Their third round walking the pond, Roger had given up on talking to Billy. He clearly was no longer paying attention to what he was saying, but Roger was okay with that. However, since Billy was no longer thinking in terms of ice hockey, Roger had to make sure that Billies trek around the frozen pond doesn’t effect the intricacies of ice texture, which in turn affected how much resistance a puck had to a stick. So Roger put his hand on Billy’s shoulder, ready to say they should stop before they walk around the frozen pond a fourth time, When they heard something southwards.

Or Rather, someone.

By the boys’ dirt bikes on the shore was an ancient beat up old red truck. And standing behind its opened door was none other than the cream-furred rabbit Elizabeth Dagger.

“Ah fuck.” Roger exclaimed, and he darted towards the shore.

“Villiam Volcott, yu ar in trouble!”

“Fuck off lady he’s busy!” Came Roger, trudging against the ice in earnest defense of his friend’s deep thought.

“Yu ar very rude!” She stepped forward, hands on her hips. “Ve have und agreement und yu ar breaking it!”

“He’s not your fucking slave!” Roger yelled, not ten feet away from her. “Fuck off!”

“Schiesse yu ar vorse then him!”

As his crush and his friend fought, Billy was on his knees, brushing the frost to peer into the depths below. Something down there had caught his eye, reflecting the light and glittering through the ice.

“Yu! Are! COVARD. UND. SCHIESSE!”

“You eat carrots because you can’t give blowjobs! With your BUCK! FUCKING! TEETH!”

“GUYS!” Billy yelled.  

The rabbit and the short boy stopped their fighting and looked to see Billy standing. “Stop fighting. I’m coming to work.”
Roger sighed in defeat while Elizabeth started for her truck.

Then, taking a step towards the frozen shoreline, Billy heard a crack, and before he could register what it was he fell through the ice, splashing into the frigid water without so much as a scream. Instead, Roger was the one to scream, falling to his knees and shaking.  “Oh fuck oh fuck oh fuck.” He grabbed his face, wringing and massaging his cheeks with his fingers as thoughts of having lost his friend filled his mind. He pounded the sand where he knelt and cried.

As soon as Elizabeth saw that Billy was gone from over her shoulder, and started to run away from the shore. Beneath the ice Billy struggled, swimming against the ice sheet above him, hoping to bump into the hole he blundered into. But light was a cruel bitch underwater, and what seemed to be an exit was just more of the underbelly of the ice sheet that trapped him in the muddy darkness of the water. He felt goosebumps all over his body as his clothes absorbed the frigid water. His throat aching for a breath of fresh air. His fingers, cut and bruised from yesterday's box shenanigans, stinged as he pressed and shoved them against the ice, desperately looking for a hole to the surface within the expansive ice sheet. As seconds passed, his cheeks began to feel like they were going to burst as his lungs screamed for oxygen, leaving him nothing he could do as he sunk to the bottom of the frozen pond but be consumed by terror, despair, and darkness. Meanwhile, back on the shoreline, Elizabeth tied a rope from the hitch of her truck to herself. She mounted the closest dirt bike, Roger’s own red beast, and revved it to life. Positioning it before a soil-topped stump along the shore, she throttled forward and ramped off the stump to smash through the ice. Exploding into the cold waters through the ice sheet, the rabbit lady let the bike sink to the bottom and searched for the boy. She spotted him at the bottom, back flat against the mud, and not being deterred by the sight of his lifeless body, she dove down to grab him and hoisted him to the surface. Roger watched as through the massive hole in the ice Elizabeth created, she emerged with Billy over her shoulder.

She sluggishly brought herself onto the ice, walked back to shore, and then threw billy on the comparatively warmer sand. She ripped open the puffed flannel of his jacket and groped her paw-beans against his chest, pressing once, twice, three times before bringing her lips to his and repeating the process until, finally, Billy sprang back to life coughing up water.

“Oh mein gott...” She slammed a fist against his stomach, making him cough again. “Dont yu scare me like sat hever hagain.”

Though her gesture made him smile, Billy didn’t care to say a word, more focused on what he had clutched in his fist as he slowly brought it up to the rabbit’s face, brushing his knuckle against her furred-cheek, and then opening his hand to show her a small bronze ring inscribed with initials 'J.C.'

===| Chapter 6 ===

Once fully resuscitated, but still in the thralls of potential hypothermia, Billy manage to utter his only on request, “Pppp please don’t take me to my dad.”

And so they, freezing wet rabbit, freezing wet sophomore and dry freshman, chucked the one remaining dirt bike into the back of the sixty year old truck and piled into its cabin. Thankfully, Elizabeth had enough sense to turn her archaic vehicle’s heat on, before driving a dirtbike into the frozen pond, making the drive to Reknowned Furniture, while humid, at least warm.

And quiet, except for the buzz of the ventilation; although, Roger did offer a few comments on how his bike was treated, but soon let it go once they were underway. 

Billy didn’t remember much of the drive, other than it was bump-filled and that they were going so fast that it was possible they had violated the speed limit once or twice if not constantly, but they only stopped when they reached the back of Reknowned Furniture. How Billy got into the bathtub he currently resides in, though, is a blur. The first thing that Billy notices is how prune his hands are, ascertaining that he must have been soaking for at least an hour. As Billy further examines his surroundings, he soon finds Elizabeth at his side outside the tub. She is currently administering hot water into the tub in increments so as to slowly raise his temperature, pressing against Billy’s forehead every now and then with her padded fingers, making him feel pampered, fragile and in need of constant attendance, like a baby. 

And now that Billy was fully aware of this pampering, he immediately asked “Aren’t you going to need a bath too?”

“Schiesse, I vas not in for as long as yu vere.” She tugged at the tuft of her on her chest. “Und I have fur.”

Billy noticed that she was in a new set of dry clothes: a blue skirt and a wifebeater without a bra, if those bumps along her chest were anything to go by. 

It was then that Billy came to the sudden realization that he was, in fact, naked, and with a splash, brought his legs to his chest and blurted “I think I’m fine now!”

The rabbit girl raised an eyebrow, muzzle dipping for a scowl, but her expression softened as she realized he wasn’t being ungrateful.
And so she laughed, laughing as she stood up to head for the bathroom door. “Yur friend said he vas getting yu closses. I vil be right out ze door for yur privacy.”

“Thanks,” Billy replied.

Once Elizebeth left the room, Billy puffed out his crimson cheeks and sighed.

“Fuck me, why am I embarrassed?” he thought. “Wasn’t my end goal something like this? Now she’ll think of me like a kid. Or gay. Fuck.”
He raised his arm out of the tub and rubbed its porcelain exterior. Maybe she already thought of him like a kid. Undressing him and throwing him in the bath, feeling his forehead and all. All actions Billy felt were mother-like, on top of being kind and caring.

“Kind and caring”, Billy repeated in his mind.

Then, past the bathroom door Billy could hear the sound of a microwave running. He thought It sounded just like the model at his house. Billy internally sighed as he now fully grasped where he was and how the lupine lass had helped him. She could’ve taken him home, he thought. Expose the chittering mess to his father and then once again he would feel the clap of the belt. But she didn't. She took him to her house, thawed him in her own private bathroom, and even gave him privacy when he asked. On top of rescuing him from certain death beneath the ice. As Billy looked around the bathroom, he felt a warmth in his heart.

“I t-think … I t-think I love her.” He whispered.

“So vat vere yu doing at sat pond?” Elizabeth yelled from the other room.

“What were you doing there?,’ responded Billy

“I vas ze one asking se questions.” He heard the creaking of floorboards outside as she stepped closer to the bathroom. “I called yur house und talked to your faser und he said yu vere at sat pond.”

Billy slapped his forehead. Of course he wasn’t going to get off scot-free.
 
He sighed before asking “How did you know where I was? Did my dad give you directions?”

It was her turn to sigh, barely audible with the distance between them. “It vas vere my foster faser died.”

“Mr Dovin-Basil?,” asked Billy.

“Ja.”

Silence fell on the apartment, save for the drip of water from the bathroom faucet.

“Hello?” Elizabeth questioned, breaking the silence. “Ar yu svalloing vater?”

“Oh no I’m fine!,” He startly responded, splashing water that smattered the tiled walls.

“Stop splashing or I vill throw you back in the pond!” She hollered, making him chuckle. 

Billy asked one more question. “So this store specializes in selling your dad’s stuff?”

“Foster faser, ja.”

“Cool,” said Billy.

Silence again. Billy wondered how long until Roger would get back with some dry clothes. Maybe his wet clothes were drier now. He could wear them home, sneak past his dad, and get in his pajamas before being noticed; get warm under the covers and dream of a different opportunity to be naked in a bath with Elizabeth. He fantasized different occasions with the lapine lass. And as the idea of marriage came up he kept thinking about proposing with a ring. A ring. The ring. The ring that he found at the bottom of the pond.
“Hey Lizzy.” He called, having come up with the nickname for her while daydreaming. “Do you have that ring?”

There was a clattering of paws against wood and what sounded like heavy boards. “Ja. Is in yur pocket vere I put it. But not for you to keep.”

Before he could ask what she meant by that, Billy heard Roger yelling at the top of his lungs. “Captain Wolcott, your relief has arrived.”

The metal stairs clanged and the wooden floorboards creaked and then to the bathroom doorway came Roger. Onto the pink-tiled floor by the tub he tossed a couple pairs of pants and dress shirts. “Get dressed so we can escape this wenches’ clutches.”

“Thanks Raj. Dad suspect anything?”

“Nah my dad wasn’t at home.” Roger said, sill standing in the doorway with his back to Billy. “And luckily neither were my brothers. Those clothes too tight?”

“I was talking about my dad. But no, they fit fine.” Billy said, toweling off his head while in new garbs. “Get me my belt, will ya?”
“Sure.” The freshman walked away from Billy’s view, yelling “Speaking of belts, I think we don’t have to worry about replacing yellow’s.”

“Vil you turn yur voice down?” Spat the rabbit woman, getting in Roger’s face. He half expected her to smack him and raised his arms in defense. Only to feel the leather belt be placed in his hands.

“What happened to yellow?”

As he listened to Roger relay the story of the dirt bikes fate in saving his life, Billy kept watch of Elizabeth. Sitting on the bed by the spiral staircase, she was busy looking at something with a magnifying glass. Though she showed a lack of interest, her apathetic frown became a slight smile when she caught him staring. Perhaps of embarrassment, or out of pride, Billy couldn't tell. But it was a smile that he would like to see until the end of his days.

"But don't worry!" The freshman capped off his tale. "We still have red! We’ll still keep it at your house, and I'll ask for a new one for my birthday. That cool?"

"Yeah." Not a single word had actually been understood by the sophomore. And Roger knew it by how little Billy spoke. So taking Billy’s shoulder, Roger pointed at the stairs and said “It’s getting late, we should go.”

“Vait.” Dropping the magnifying glass into the pink covers, Elizabeth rose from her bed. “I vill give yu a ride home.”

It was dark outside, and the old lights of the truck barely illuminated the road as they drove. 

Their first destination, Roger’s house, was at the east side of town along the bay, no more than a two minute drive. Light reflected off the shiny-black shutters of Roger’s House as they pulled into the driveway. It was L-shaped, a white-washed whaling captain’s lodge. Bolted to its western face, a steel nameplate, with golden letters that read “Jebediah’s Redoubt.”

Before Roger left the truck, Elizabeth made a quick announcement

“Tomorrow, I vill need both of yu und any friends yu have for a serious task.” Her attention shifted from directly to Billy. “Yu do sis, I vill consider it repayment for saving yur life und I vill forgive ze destruction of my property.”

“Deal!” Billy didn’t didn’t even wait for Roger to respond. He wanted nothing more than to get on the rabbit’s good graces.

“Good,” said Ellizibeth.

Roger opened the door, waving goodbye to Billy and walked to his door as slow as possible. Most polite people would have waited in the driveway for their guest to reach the door before leaving. Elizabeth, however,  reversed as soon as Roger was out of the truck, and headed for Billy’s house. Leaving the roger to watch as his friend drove off with a strange rabbit.

Said friend was absolutely enamored with the lapine though. Leaning against the passenger window, he casually glanced and peaked at her before shifting focus to the road. His attention wasn’t on the physical beauty of her. Though there was plenty before him. How the shirt curved around her chest, confirming that she did indeed have eight rows of nipples. How the sapphire skirt tightened against her thighs as she hit the gas. Little details that were at the back of his head, but weren’t what was really on his mind.  Rather, he just imagined being the one to drive her next time, to be her personal chauffeur.

When she looked right ways coming onto the rotary, Elizabeth noticed his stare. “Yu okay?”

“Oh yeah I’m fine.” Billy straightened his back against the leather seat. “I uh, ow you a lot, Lizzy.”

“Elizabeth.” She retorted.

“Elizabeth.” He said respectfully, heart fluttering as he thought about saying ‘I am forever grateful to you’ only to hold back. ‘Saying something like that isn’t cool.’ He chided himself. ‘I’m going to be cool. I’m going to be cool and that’s how she’ll love me.’
A right turn and a couple blocks of houses past and they reached Billy’s house. Dad was standing in the doorway, nursing a beer.
Taking a deep breath, He sauntered up to the truck, and opened the passenger-side door and said, “Go to bed.” 

Billy obeyed, first running a few steps, then stopping to wave at Elizabeth. With a weak but warm smile, Elizabeth waved back, and said “See yu tomorrow.”

Then she addressed the boy’s father. “Thank yu for yur help. Ven he verks vith me tomorrow, he will have paid his dets.”

“Good.” Mr Wolcott closed the truck door and returned to his home, leaving her in silence.

The silence carried on into her drive as she took the wrong turn at the rotary. A left here, a right there, casually getting lost down roads whose name she didn’t bother to read. It was all foreign to her, worth nothing more than resentment so long as she was stuck there. Forever unable to greet them again. Or give a proper goodbye. Or feel their warmth in a group hug. Or even see them, for even in the most intimate and important memories, their faces were nothing more than a cloud fading into nothingness. And until she saw them again would she never feel peace.

Somehow in getting lost in her thoughts Elizabeth found her way back to the parking lot behind Renowned Furniture. She walked around to the front entrance, the back door now boarded up. Once she was before her bed again, the rabbit woman collapsed onto the covers and sighed.

Grabbing the magnifying glass and returning to her deep focus, Elizabeth thought about Billy. That despite all the trouble he caused, the boy could be a boon.

Turning over the bronze ring in her paws, Elizabeth whispered “Jetzt hast du deinen frienden."

# The Sleeping Town

By 10:00 P.M. the small new England town of Catuvella roads and passages were tucked under darkness save for the black-steel street lamps along Main Street and the more modern lights of King’s Highway. However, anybody turning onto Seaside Road from any of two prior streets, would find themselves immediately enshrouded by darkness, as they entered the mostly untouched wilderness conservation of Webb’s Causeway. The unlit route runs along avery narrow sub peninsula that hugs the south and south east coast of Cattuvela, gradually jutting out from the mainland and into the ocean. However, Despite stark contrast between these three routes, night was the great equalizer silencing without prejudice. From its usually bustling residential zone, where every square inch was packed with cottages, mansions, resorts and parking lots, to the mostly untouched conservation of Webb’s Causeway, the town slept. Though some parts more than others, such as on Webb’s Island, located at the very end of Webb’s Causeway.. Where its iconic weather dome stood over the treetops, her interior abandoned though her exterior is known well by locals. At day it was a landmark, the last man-made building seen by every fishing ship and clamming skiff before they exited Orc harbor. At night, it 
was the preferred hiding spot for Catuvella P.D.’s own Officer Williams.

In his cruiser he slept much like how he did winter nights before. Bundled in blankets, with the heater blasting and the seat reclined. This was his self-imposed vacation, a gift for working so hard in the summer and coming home exhausted after dealing with drunk teens and lost foreigners during the AM. 

An easy shift where nothing disturbed him.

And then he heard it.

Thunk.

Thunk.

Officer Williams opened his eyes and brushed aside crumbs and looked out the windshield, but he didn’t see anything.

Thunk.

Thunk.

He quickly turned the keys to his car and then blasted his brights in a frantic attempt to reveal the thunker.

Every tree in the forest ahead of him was illuminated, but he still didn’t see anyone.

Thunk.

Thunk.

The policeman had enough. He took a deep breath and reached for his radio. “Dispatch, Dispatch this is Officer Williams.”
“Williams, this is dispatch, come back.” The radio cracked.

“Yeah I took a detour to Webbs for a leak, and heard a strange noise.” He said, eyeing the building to the right of his car. “Possible trespassers in the abandoned weather station. Going to kick them out, over.”

“Roger that. Dispatch standing by.”

And so Williams threw off his blankets, opened his car door and started for the dome. He didn’t feel it necessary to lock the car. What idiot kid trespasser would be willing to commit a felony?

Thunk. 

Thunk.

Again came that noise, this time in rapid succession. Just when he was standing before the weather station’s entrance. Williams reached for his pistol, a Colt m1911 with a flashlight attachment. Turning on the flashlight and maintaining the safety as he stepped through the rotting dorway. 

Once through, his nasal cavities filled with snot as they tried to adjust to the musky interior. His flashlight cut through the oppressive darkness only to reveal that nothing much was really inside: grass growing through the moss-covered hardwood floor, a rusted white desk was turned on its side beneath the stairway leading to the dome, and hanging from the middle of the ceiling, a wooden beam, nibbled on by termites he could probably see if he stepped closer.

Thunk.

Thunk.

Williams pointed his gun upward towards, the noise was coming from the next floor up. Still sure that the thunkers were just kids messing with him, Williams tried being diplomatic.

“Hello? This is the police.” 

He sidestepped closer to the stairs as he yelled, keeping his aim high above. 

“You’re trespassing on condemned property. Don’t make me come up there.”

His tone was serious and authoritative, but truth be told he didn’t want to go up there. The wood of the stairs was rotting and in some places gone, leaving just the metal under frame remaining.

Then the noise came again.

Thunk.

Thunk. 

Thunk.

And this time, it felt directed at him, teasing him, even intimidation. Whoever was up there was challenging the officer, and Williams will not stand for such insolence, especially from a bunch a dumb hooligan kids.

So Williams climbed the stairs, slowly, taking each step bit by bit, keeping his pistol trained upwards. He still didn’t dare turn off the safety. A negligible discharge at best towards a kid, or worse, a harmless animal?

Once at the top, the officer could see no one and nothing there..no one was peering over the side, not even a telescope or whatever he thought went in a dome like this.

So, three steps from the top and seeing naught but the bolts and beams making the weather dome, Officer Williams breathed a sigh of relief. “Must’ve been the wind or... or a woodpecker.”

He started his descent down the stairs, and then he heard it again.

Thunk.

And then soon after, the stair step beneath his foot gave way.

He slipped downwards through the narrow step opening, through the broken board right before his waist was caught in the steps narrow rectangular frame, leaving his legs dangling beneath the stairs. “FUCK.” He yelled, his pistol dropping. 

In the dark he struggled, heaving and kicking without any vision as the flashlight on his pistal pointed at the door.
Then, the steps at once, the steps that surrounded the one he is currently stuck in broke, frame, board and all.

He landed on his ass, smacking against the desk, which surprisingly caught his weight without a sign of breaking.

“For fucks sake.” Williams cursed , stepping off the abandoned furniture and rubbing his ass as he carefully made his way to his pistol, stepping over what was once part of the stairs...

Thunk 

Thunk.

He picked up his pistol and made a quick egress out of the building, before stopping to catch his breath.

“All that for nothing but ass pains.” The officer said, tapping the side of his pistol flashlight. It flickered, and then died. “And a broken flashlight.”

The pistol was holstered, a deep breath was taken, and the cop walked back to his car.

Thunk.

Thunk.

THUNK.

It was right behind him now, and Williams spun on his heel, hands on his pistol, only to freeze what he saw. 

“Hello laddie.” Its words, her words for the voice was distinctly female albeit husky, seemed to ooze out like the last gurgles of a drowning victim.

“Why don’t we go for a swim?”

Minutes later, Webb’s Island was silent once more. Then the radio of Williams police cruiser barked.

“Williams, Williams, this is dispatch. Come back, over.”

“Williams, Williams, this is Dispatch. Come back, over.”

“Williams?!”

===| Chapter 7 ===

“Yeah, I didn’t sleep at all last night.” Yawned Roger. His exhale became a swirling cloud in the cold that gently dispersed as he walked through. “It was like, every cop car in town was driving by my house last night.”

“Was it the rabbit lady?” Frank eyed the furniture store, worry plastered across his face. “Did she rat us out?”

The signal to cross lit up, and Billy shoved his two friends forward into the street. “No. Come on, we can’t be late.”

Frank stopped in the middle of the road and looked over his shoulder, seeing nothing but a wall of fog and the sidewalk he left. 
 “Is she blackmailing you? Is that why you’re in a hurry to get to her?” Roger asked Billy

“No, I’m repaying her.” Billy grunted, waving his friend on. “...with your help.”

“So she is blackmailing us.” Frank pulled at his dreadlocks, chuckling nervously. “She’s hopping mad!”

A truck honked as the frost-glazed crossing light started to flicker. The highschoolers hastily traversed King’s Highway, and then Main Street onto the sidewalk from the rotary that led to their destination. The Episcopal church was no longer visible, blocked by a thick wall of fog.

“I think Frank’s got a point.” Roger rubbed his baggy right eye. “By holding our team captain hostage, we have no choice but to help.”

“I’m not a hostage.”  The blonde whirled around to glare at his friends, his gold-haired unibrow scrunched in a scold. Roger and Frank stepped back, Roger mumbling “Fuck, why so angry?”

The team captain stopped and took a deep breath and rubbed his head. “I’ll be clear. I just want to get on good terms with her, alright?”

“Alright man, glad you’re being transparent.” Frank said, thinking he had a funny pun.

“What if we don’t like what she asks?” Roger asked.

“I won't make you guys do it, then.” Billy replied. 
  
“What if that’s her plan?” Frank eyed a starling as it perched on an overhung gutter. “Give us impossible tasks, and then she’ll keep you forever? You know what that is?”

His two friends paused to look at him.

“A hare-brained scheme.”

Then he received a fusillade of punches to the shoulder among some laughs.  Wiping a tear from his eye, Roger looked across the street. “Where’s Mikey?”

“I don’t know, man.” Billy said, opening the rime-coated door to Renowned Furniture. “He said his parents would be home tonight, so he should be here.”

Once everyone was within the dark building, Billy continued. “Even if he’s a no show, we’ll be fine. We’ll be able to do the job.”

To his friends, this was the first time they had seen the dark interiors of the store. In the short time since it was last dusted, new cobwebs had popped up in every corner and a fresh blanket of grime had settled on every surface. 

Worse, at least in Frank's eyes since it made him want to leave, the room wasn’t lit by any of the studio lights overhead. Instead, the bright, flickering light was pouring out from the third floor. It reflected off the bronze locks and steel handles and flax-lined novels walled on the bookcases, Giving the interior a smoggy, orange hue.

“Elizabeth?” Called Billy as the three boys walked between the walls of knicknacks. There was no response.

A book caught Roger’s eye, a turquoise whale imprinted on its side. The short freshman stepped aside and pulled it out, the cover reading “The history of -”, its topic scratched out from the leather binding long ago. Flipping through the pages revealed shoal maps off the coast of Catuvella, underwater topography, and diagrams of lighthouses, light ships and buoys.

“Elizabeth?” yelled Billy again now at the foot of the spiral staircase, who, unlike actually focusing on what they came here for.
Frank soon joined Roger in his alternative pursuits.  “Is that a nipple?”

“Label says deck prism,” replied Roger

“Guys, fuck off.” Interjected Billy. “She wouldn’t want you-”

“Scheisse, boy, vy so hangry?”

From the top of the staircase descended Elizabeth, candle in hand. Garbed in a loose grey dress which slid down the steps like flowing water, she made her way down slowly. 

The very sight made Billy’s heart burn as he gazed in wonderment, fantasizing on how well she’d look in a wedding dress.
“Sorry.” spoke the lapine lass. “Ze door repairman came und sey vanted electric locks und sey popped a fuse und now I have to use candles.”

While Billy was busy, staring, mouth agape, Roger questioned the rabbit with indignation. “Hey lady, what’s with the dress?”

“It came with ze candles.” She answered nonchalantly as she passed Billy. “Are sey avare vere sey are?”

“Huh?” was all that Billy could say, tripped up by her wording and accent.

Brushing the blonde boy aside, she swayed her hips as she walked towards Roger. The short boy was dumbstruck, not by her beauty but how strange she looked up close in the dimly lit room.

“Sis...” She snatched the book out of his hands and closed it. “is mein foster faser’s, Mister Dovin-Basil.”

Frank peaked up from behind Roger, whispering. “Wait, wasn’t that...” He took an elbow to the ribs from Roger, who coughed a “yes.”
The rabbit lady continued, walking back to Billy. “Mein Foster Faser collected artifacts from as long ago as Vebb’s village.”

Then she held up her hand-paw, showing off the bronze ring labeled “J.C.” on her finger. “Sis vas ze last sing he showed me before his deas, und I sink it vas himportant enough to him he vore it to his deas.”

Carefully, sliding the ring up her digit and past the little pink paw pad tip, Elizabeth held it up to the light. “Hold out yur hand.”
Billy did so, and clasping the circlet in his calloused palm, the rabbit gave her mission.

“I vant yu to rebury sis ring vith mein foster foser.”

He ever carefully put the ring in his breast pocket as the lapine lass turned and started up the stairs. “I vill change now.”

With the ring in a protected spot, Billy scratched his chin. “You know what, maybe we are going to need Mikey.”

“I’m not doing it.” Declared Roger. “This goes against my beliefs.”

“Oh come on Raj!” Billy exclaimed. “We have the dead’s relatives' permission.”

“It’s sacrilege to desecrate a body after it’s been buried!” Roger uttered almost instantly, looking around the store nervously. “Also, you said if we didn’t want to do it, you wouldn’t make us.”

“Yes. We, as in You and Frank. The part of a team that aren't me, the captain.” He pointed at both his friends. “You have to decide democratically.”

“We didn’t agree to that.” Roger responded in a high pitched voice. He meant to sound distraught, but it came out more like a whine.

“Well that’s how we dealt with similar shit.” Billy bursted, now in Roger’s face.

“Well I say no.” Roger straightened his back and grit his teeth before looking at the only other boy here. “Frank?”

“Uhhhhhh.” It was his turn to look around the room and shake his knees. “I don’t really dig grave robbing, buuut...”

“HAH!” spat Roger to Billy, making the blond boy clench his fist.

“But I don’t want to not to do it, otherwise we get snitched on,” added Frank

In the floor above ,Elizabeth hummed a tune as she folded the dress. She enjoyed listening to the drama below, chuckling as she purred “Ihn’n zum spott und zum verdross...”

“Oh so you’re just gonna play the middle?” chided Roger.

“Back off Roger, it's his right,” declared Billy.

The two friends were squaring off, fists clenched at their sides though no one raised their fist or shouted. Frank stepped between them, arms raised, and said “Why don’t we just let Mike be the tie breaker.”

“Deal” said Roger and BIlly simultaneously, and the group turned to watch the door, in anticipation for Mike’s arrival.

The avoidance of a fight was appreciated by Billy. It was getting heated, and he didn’t want to risk losing his cool in front of a girl.

The girl.

Elizabeth was more than just some girl to him at this rate. And he wouldn’t let himself be dragged down, especially not by one of his insubordinates.

Insubordinates. He repeated the word in his head, wondering “Why..?”

Just then Mikey walked through the door, and Billy’s brow furled again. “shit.”

“Sorry!” yelled Mikey, holding the glass door open as four little ginger girls ran in. The eldest,  Agnes, not even six years old, was the first to strike as she grabbed Frank’s dreadlocks until he screeched. Before Frank and the other boys could contemplate what was happening, a second strike came from 5 year old Aileen as she repeatedly kicked Frank's shin until he fell over, no match for their vicious pincer attack. The boys, now in disarray as a third of their team had already fallen, to the third enemy combatant Aran, who wasn’t yet four, as she ran after Roger, begging for piggy back rides. While the youngest at three years old, Angel, laughed, watching Roger hop atop the store desk to escape the little menace that was her sister. Then Angel looked to Billy and upon seeing his frown, started to cry.

“Agnes! Get off mikey! Aileen, I will spank you!” Mike started for the two nuisances that were devastating Frank, but stopped to pick up his sister, angel, when she heard her crying. “My parents had to drive to fucking Bristol for a union meeting last minute.”

The blonde boy put his hands in his pocket and raspberried to let off steam, causing Angel to chuckle.

“It's alright Mike. You down to go grave robbing?”

“Fuck yeah,  so long as it keeps them busy.”

“Thats unfair!” Yelled Roger, Aran jumping in front of him with arms raised. “You're violating my first amendment! This is tyranny of the majority!”

His statements weren’t addressed as Billy lifted up Aileen by the arms. “Hey you little thing! Do you want to learn how to use a shovel?”

Unamused by Billy’s whimsy and deceit, She answered him with a kick to his spleen.

A weird noise came out of Billy’s throat, and he dropped the girl. She landed on her feet. Satisfied with the pain and torment she afflicted upon, returned to tie up loose ends as she returned to kicking Frank. Mike exchanged the crying girl for the kicking one, the former standing over Billy and continuing to sob.

“All-lee! Do you want me to spank you? I will put you in the corner!” The older brother of the sisters was now turning red in the face. “Agnes! Get! Off! My! Friend! Aran! Get away! All of you are going to bed without dinner when we get home!”

Between groans of pain AND Mike’s wrath, Billy almost didn’t notice that the girls had all but shut up. Even the crying Angel had ceased her mewling.

“ YU VILL NOT TALK TO SEM LIKE SAT!”

Elizabeth had entered the fray, walking down the stairs in red plaid pajama pants and a t-shirt. A multi-bra underneath, Billy noticed.
“What?” Mike planted his once-kicking sister on the ground. The red head boy was completely unphased by the fact he was now yelling at an anthro rabbit in pajamas. “These are my sisters. I need to lay down the law when they misbehave.”

“ Yu do not no how to deal vis younger sisters!”

The girls, all four of them including Aran ran around the spiral staircase and surrounded Elizabeth, seemingly mesmerized by her presence.

“I’d like to see you do better!”

Watching things from the ground, Billy had an idea.

“Hey! Stop!” Billy brushed his coat off as he raised and picked up the littlest sister, Angel. Walking to the rabbit lady, he rocked the girl in hand gently. “Why don’t you ignore what my friend said, and have a proper introduction?”

Elizabeth looked at the littlest girl, her nose twitching slightly. The little ginger smelled just like applesauce.

“That's Aignes, Aileen, Aran...” The boy struggled to properly hold the toddler, instead leaning towards the big bunny as if making an offer. “And this is Angel.”

The girl’s eyes met, Elizabeth’s pupil’s like pinpricks. Angel, looking over the furry lady like a new toy, pulled her thumb out of her mouth to say “Wabbit!”

Aran yelled, Elizabeth hopped, then Agnes and Aileen joined, startling Elizabeth and causing her to jump. Her ears twitched as the sisters raised their hands, asking for uppies, huggsies, pettsies and whatever the kid’s babbled. The rabbit seemed caught in a trap, standing absolutely still, mind in a frenzy. Billy coughed to get her attention, and asked “Can you please look after them?”
Her mouth went agape, showing off her buck teeth. “I...I...”

“Please.” Now he had put Angel right in her face, causing the rabbit’s ears to shake. “If you can watch them, we can get the job done tonight.”

Silence. All the Callaghan sisters had their lips closed, and focused on Elizabeth. She looked at them, biting her lip. When her gaze met Angel’s, she reflexively offered to take her, to which Billy obliged.

“Vell...” Her mind raced to come up with an excuse. But, to be back in that position, going through the familiar motions, of better times of days gone by. All doubts washed away as she looked into the green eyes of those little girls.

“I vill do it.”

And once more the candle-lit room was filled with chaos. The little girls all bugged Elizabeth, tugging at her pajamas, poking her tail, hopping with their hands raised as if to grab her ears. Angel laughed as Elizabeth struggled to verbally discipline them. “Stop! Down! Dont tug mein pants! No! Ach!”

Billy enjoyed the cute scene, though he stepped back slowly to avoid any unwarranted attention. He was still bothered by the chat about children he had a few days ago with Mike.

Mike sighed in relief as what felt like a weight was lifted off his chest, and took a seat on the floor. Roger, feeling safe at last, speed walked past the horde of girls, careful not to touch any and receive their fury once more. Frank got up, repressing the trauma that happened just moments ago, and pointed a finger at Roger. “Are you coming?”

Roger rubbed behind his ears. “I told my dad this was a job. I don’t want to piss him off thinking I was lazy and got fired.”
Coming up behind, Billy tapped Roger’s shoulder. “If it makes you feel any better, I have the same excuse.”
“Me too.” Said Frank. “Hey Miss Eliza, since we’re all doing this job for you..?”

The rabbit girl looked upwards as she rocked two girls in her arms. “Schiesse, does sat mean I have to pay all of you?” Her voice seemed filled with genuine worry, but her actual feelings could be deduced from the shit-eating grin she wore. “Go dig up mein foster fasser. Ze grave is located in ze middle of ze old cemetery.”

The boys funneled out the exit, Billy hesitating before stepping out the door. He watched as the girls, starting to come to terms that Elizabeth was not, in fact, a giant toy but another adult in their lives, and, thus, out of boredom, began to mess with her stuff, pulling books, shuffling chairs, climbing atop dangerously stacked furniture. “Schiessse! Stop! No! Bad!” Gripping Angel in her arms, Elizabeth glanced at him. “Everysing okay?”

“Yeah.” The blonde boy muttered with a dumb smile a mile wide across his face.

“Sen I vill see you later.”

“Come on Billy!” Yelled Roger, who had already crossed mainstreet.

Billy raised his hand, repressing a slight desire to stick around and help her with the Callaghan girls. “Goodbye.”

She didn’t say goodbye back, her hand taken by Agnes as she pointed at something in the back and babbled a question.

He watched her fade into the near-darkness as she walked to the back of the store with the girls, and then he was out the door.

===| chapter 8 === 

Under the amber lights of the King’s Highway the fog lingered, the boys looked glossed in yellow as they walked. They reached Billy’s house at 3:30 P.M., and upon finding his dad sound asleep, left heading north by 4:00 P.M.. Clanking shovels against the railway and dragging a length of three strand nylon rope, they reached the back of the cemetery right at sunset.

“So where did the big eared lady say her dad was?” Roger asked, climbing over the steel barred fence.

“I didn’t ask,” Billy answered, already inside the limits of the fence, smacking his fidgety flashlight back to life against his hand.
Frank’s pencil-like arms wobbled as he raised himself over the fence. “Ddd-did you carrot to ask?” He wheezed.  

“We don’t need to.” Billy said. Soon after, the flashlight hummed and Billy pointed it to his left. “New burials were over here.”

Billy walked westwards, not bothering to wait for the others.

“Why is he walking?” Roger questioned, leaning on his shovel. “We should be hurrying to find it before the cops pass by.”

Roger then covered his eyes, blinded by the bright headlamp sported by Mike as he turned to him to answer his question. “He knows where he’s going, Roger. Just give him space.”

It wasn’t called The Old Cemetery because it fell out of use. Nor because there was a better place to bury the dead in Catuvella. Real estate, conservation grounds, zoning laws and a generally small year-round population of three-thousand deterred the need for another, grander graveyard. Even if Catuvella had three more funeral homes than the next three towns over, didn’t mean they had three times the deaths. Just meant it was a nice enough town, a quiet enough populace. Perfect for the dead who had friends all over yet no particular home of their own.

 It is called the Old Cemetery much like how revered elders are called old. 

A title of disobedience, fitting those who lived long and either garnered respect, or compelled trepidation. 

This final resting place, so belittled by those who ended up there, its slander was made official years ago. A metal sign placed at its gates, labeled “Catuvella Old Cemetery, Est. 1800.” For the sons of sailors, and wives of fishermen, and brothers of landscapers, did not fear death when they had the comfort of life. 

Though some were less comfortable than others, and that could be said true for Billy.

He circled around the same block of stones towards the west end of the cemetery and read each name. 

Jenconner, Jeffries, Poutine, Wallace. 

Twenty stones and bevels and pyramids and little sarcophagi and not one he desired. 

Not that he expected an easy search for the stone.

He was a stranger. He never knew Elizabeth’s foster father other than what he had read in the papers and, and what his father had said.
 But he’d thought it be over here, near hers. 

And so every time he passed by he thought he’d find it and then he’d feel less stupid glancing at her grave over and over. Much like how one feels stupid saying goodbye and then running into that person moments later. 

Especially someone who couldn’t speak at all.

“Did you find the grave?” Yelled Roger as he ran up to his team captain.

“Its not where I thought it would be.” Replied Billy. “So we’re gonna have to split up and search.”

“Again?” The freshman dropped his shovel and sat down. “Listen, maybe this is a sign we should give up. We’re committing a sin. God’s gonna fuck us over if we keep it up. So let’s take this as a sign and-”

Billy knelt and covered his mouth with a gloved hand. “Shhhh!” He pointed at Mike and Frank, who were close by, and in a loud whisper ordered “Get down!”

“Hello?”

Only three meters behind the boys flashed a light, the white beam dissipating in the thick fog. As it came closer, the boys shuffled ever away, ducking and hiding behind the graves. As Billy peaked over the side of a large slab, he recognized the man holding the light.

It was none other than their history teacher, Mister Young. The man looked about the graves but didn’t dare shuffle off the path, missing the boys. Huffing, Mr. Young turned around and walked from where he came from.

“Let’s follow him” whispered Billy, and he set down his shovel and rope. “We’ll come back for these.”

Moving from grave to grave to remain unseen, The students tailed their instructor. Tracking him all the way to the end of the cemetery where they had hopped the fence, they watched.

“What’s he doing?” murmured Roger as he snaked next to Billy.

“Shh.”

Mister Young stood before the massive grave, an obelisk capped by a fleur-de-lis. Kneeling before the memorial, a deep breath sounded from the teacher.

 Hearing the grown man sob, The highschoolers cringed.

After ten minutes, the teacher sniffled, wiped his nose with his sleeve, and left.

When they were sure they were without company, Roger was the first to speak. “What the fuck was that about?”

“He must’ve had a grave reason.” Frank joked, walking to the obelisk and shining a flashlight on it. “Oh- guys check it out!”

He kept the light on the stone as they stood gathered around the grave marked Dovin-Basil. 
 
“Alright, that’s our guy!” Billy started to walk where he had left the digging gear.

Fifteen minutes later, Mike asked “Why do you think Mister Young of all people was visiting this grave?”

“Don’t know.” dismissed the team captain.

“Teacher’s have social lives.” Roger watched his three friends while he sat against the obelisk. “Maybe Young and this guy were relatives.”

In Between coughing from all the hard work, Frank joked. “Maybe...Young...Digged...This guy.”

“Franky, you haven’t gotten any funnier since we left the store.”

“I’m ... anxious.” The boy in dreadlocks said as he wiped his brow.

“Raj, why don’t you help if you’re just gonna distract us.”

“I’m giving you guys light.” He waved the flashlight around the three-foot deep hole. “And watching for the police.” There was a second where the light seemed to veer away as the boy rubbed his eyes. “Also, I’m fatigued.”

Another five minutes passed and the hole was five feet deep. Rocks started to fly off their shovels instead of dirt the further down they went. When they finally struck the tomb, Roger felt the need to offer one last comment. “I still don’t approve of this.”

“Whatever Raj.” Billy pulled himself out of the grave while his fellow grave robbers started to scrape the dirt caked atop the elmwood casket. Once it was fully uncovered, they too scrambled to the top of the hole.

“I don’t like being down there.” Coughed Frank. “Can we just open it now?”

“We gotta haul it up first.” The blonde boy said unraveling the rope off his shoulder. “Then it should open easy.”

He gave Frank the rope, and then slid down the hole. “Hold on while I secure it. Mikey, you throw yours down too.”

While his friends worked, or rather while Billy tied the ropes and Mike and Frank stood idly watching with flashlights pointed at the hole, Roger walked off. 

He had started to regain his energy as he became increasingly annoyed. “We’re gonna get in trouble.” He got on the concrete path lining the graveyard and started for the entrance. “We’re gonna get fucked.”

Before the exit looking at main street, Roger stood. He thought maybe it’d be best to start walking home now before shit hit the fan. “At least I can say I told you so.”

The short boy reminisced against a tombstone. “I’m gonna start for home. I’m going to go straight to bed. I’m going to go to school tomorrow. And I’m gonna say when I see them enter the school with an officer escort ‘I told you so.’

He wore a shit eating grin like it was a metal. “Yeah. I can hear the sirens already.”

Sirens.

Instinctively Roger ran to the Dovin-Basil obelisk.

“Oh now you’ve decided to join us.” Chided Billy, standing next to a closed casket. “Well while you’re here, can you pick a lock?”
“Dude the fucking cops are coming!”

Frank, laying on the grass from exhaustion, rolled on his stomach, stood up and ran for the fence.

“Coward!” Yelled Mikey. He turned towards the team captain, looking for orders, just as he heard a DINK. Shining in the flashlight’s luminescence was Billy’s shovel, embedded between the casket and its top.

“Get over here and help me wedge this thing open!” Ordered Billy. The two boys gripped the shovel as the sirens came closer. Blue and red lights intermingled in the fog to reflect purple off the leafless trees. Roger got on his knees and started to pray.

“One! Two! Three!”

Crack.

The lock on the casket gave way, the wood surrounding it shattering under the boy's strength. With no time to lose, Billy threw it open. He paused to shine his light at the corpse inside.

The skin had turned gray, and crinkled like paper around the eye sockets and mouth. Teeth had fallen out and jangled in the back of the skull. The nose had collapsed and left a razor-thin shark fin over the nasal concha.

It smelled, rightly so, like someone had died.

The sirens were just at the gates now.

“Billy..?” Mikey asked, a flashlight aimed at the ground.

“Go dark.” Billy put his light in the coffin to shine at the deceased’s left hand.

Mikey turned his flashlight off. Roger did the same, and  then came over to the casket.

“What are you doing?” Roger whispered anxiously.

“I’m putting the ring on the right hand.”

“Thats his fucking left!”

“That's what I mean!” While with one hand he pulled out the J.C. ring, With the other Billy lifted the hand up. Several rings already on the dead man’s finger slipped off and clattered against the wood. Flinching at the noise, Billy also dropped his ring.

“Good Job smart ass.”

“Guys.” Mike went prone and pressed himself against a couple of graves. The sound of men talking was coming ever closer.
Rushing to attach the rings to the crusted digits, Billy brought each ring up to the light. Then he noticed it.

There were two bronze rings labeled J.C.

“Mr Dovin-Basil already has a ring like this!”

“I knew this was for nothing!”  Roger squeaked, causing Billy to drop the ring on the soil. Billy almost yelled, but instead he shuffled over to the coffin’s lid.

“Help me close the lid. We’ll throw him back in the grave and make a run for it.”

They closed the lid as Mike dragged himself over to help. With a thud, the boys had pushed casket into its resting spot.

Then Mike and Billy picked up their equipment and started throwing it over the fence, while Roger stayed behind.

Uttering what little he remembered about the prayer to the deceased, Into the grave he moved handfuls of dirt. As his hands sifted through the soil, Roger’s grip closed around the ring. Rather than fulfilling the heretical wishes of the rabbit, he pocketed the trinket. Just as he was about to finish the burial, a thimble of light streaked across his face.

The police walked by the obelisk, not a second after Roger ducked. They carried on their search, never having noticed him.

With a silent curse Roger rung his hands and made for the fence. He hopped it and landed amid an entanglement of limbs. Struggling, he almost screamed when a hand clasped against his mouth.

 “SHHH” Said Billy, covered in leaves.

Within the cemetery, lights swirled all around as radios blared from the police. Then one by one, the voices calmed, the lights dissipated, and then the sirens disappeared off in the distance.

Roger, Billy and Mike waited ten minutes, and then they scrambled for the railway.

Chapter 9

“You should join the track team.” 

The boys had regrouped at Billy’s house, dropped off their shovels and rope, and now were making for Elizabeth’s. 

“Seriously, Frank. With how fast you ran, abandoning us and all, you could make state champion.”

Roger grilled Frank, lagging behind Billy and Mike. “Maybe you’ll get to cut ribbons with giant scissors. Use them to give yourself a proper haircut.”

“How many times do I have to apologize?” Frank limped, his face still red under the street lamps. There wasn’t any fog to coat them in gold light. It had cleared in the time it took them to return their tools.  They hadn’t seen or heard any police sirens. The only noise was their footsteps, as words no longer came from Roger. 

“Until I’m home.” He sat on the sidewalk just as they reached Renowned furniture, and took a deep breath. 

“Raj, cut it out.” Billy mumbled, grabbing the door. “If you want to wait here until I’m back, I’ll just tell her what happened.”

Roger raised a thumb over his shoulder, not bothering to watch his friends enter the store. Content to look nowhere but the dimly lit sidewalks and storefronts around him.

“I don’t see any of my sisters.” Mike’s face was pressed against the window, cold class leaving dew against his freckled nose and cheeks. 

“They’re upstairs, I’m sure of it.” Billy opened the door, a tired look on his face “Do you think she’ll be angry if I told her that Dovin-Basil already had a JC ring?”

“When she learns how well we buried her father, she’ll be angry. ” Mike sidestepped into the store. “Did you ask how we can prove we even buried it?”

“No.” The team captain dug into his pockets. The dirt-coated fleece interior itched and scratched his dry skin. “We’re dirty, that could be proof enough.”

“Would it?” 

Billy didn’t know. He looked around, feeling stupid and foolish. The vice gripped behind his eyes as he thought of the different ways this situation could go. 

He could say they didn’t get the job done because Dovin already had a ring and they lost the one they brought. She’d probably be pissed, have then go back to the grave, and then get even angrier about the state they left it. And then there would go Billy’s chances with her.

He could say say he lost the ring, which did happen. And the same outcome would occur.

Would he be okay lying? All that’d have to happen is for her to see the grave. He’d have to bring his friends back, fix it up. But not now. The cops almost caught them the first time they visited.
 
As his friends stood still thinking, Frank bumped into a bookshelf trying to navigate the dark interiors. Landing on his ass, he exclaimed “Why’s it quiet?” 

Noticing it too, Mikey slapped his forehead and ran towards the only source of light; The flickering metal of the spiral staircase. Running up the flight of Stairs, Mike called “Agnes! Aran! Aileen! Angel!”

Hearing his friend’s cries reverb through the air, Billy was out of his trance. He lifted Frank to his feet and galloped up the steps, stopping just before his head could peak over the top. Blocking them was their red headed friend, standing still, peaking over the top of the pink carpeted entrance.

“Why’d you stop?” Whispered Billy, staring up as the candlelight danced on the rosy cheeks of his friend.

As his face relaxed into a smile, the redhead took a step back, letting his friend’s pass to share the view.

Peaking over the top, the boys were in view of the room’s north face, where under a round window was the bed. On top of its puffy pink comforter, picture book in hand, lay on her stomach, Elizabeth.  Surrounding her, in various awkward yet comfortable positions, stared the wide eyes of Mike’s four sisters. 

“Ven I vent to bed Nick took back ze pillow he said I could keep und the Mickey Mouse night light burned out und I bit my tongue.” 
Licking her finger, she toyed with the corner of the page, peaking around her shoulders to check on the sisters. When her eyes shifted back to the book, she saw the three boy’s heads. With his hands, Billy waved ‘continue.’  

Elizabeth coughed and obliged. “Ze cat vants to sleep vith Ansony, not vith me.” She made a pouty face to her left at Agnes. “It has been und terrible, horrible, no good, very bad day.”
 
Closing the blue-covered book, by memory she recounted its ending. “My mom says some days are like sat.”

Silence, save for the snoring of Aileen as her head hung over the side of the bed. 

Once more Billy felt akward yet happy at the sight of Elizabeth. Her tired eyes drifted back to him, as if to speak wordlessly ‘Enjoying ze view?’ 

“Why’d you read that book?” Mike said as he leaned against the banister. Hearing her brother’s words, Aileen stirred, off the bed she started to slide.

Elizabeth halted the toddler’s descent by grabbing her foot and dragging them back onto the bed. Giggling and screaming, Aileen woke the other sisters. 

“Sometimes I have to remind myself.” The rabbit girl said as she dispersed a healthy serving of tickles. “Und its a good story for zees little monsters. Vant sem back?”

“Nah you can keep them.” Mike started collecting the girls, Picking angel up and heaving Agnes under his arm. “Come on guys, lets head home.”

“Vait!” The rabbit girl got up, and stretched. “I vill give you und ride home. Zey vere good girls.”

The stairs rattled as Frank ran down them, the girl’s cuteness overwhelmed by his self preservation. Then came Agnes, and Aileen, and Aran and Mike with Angel and then Elizabeth, with Billy making up the rear. He stayed at the top even as his crush reached the bottom. 

She turned towards him, giving a smile that was a fatigued yet loving. “You okay boy?”

“Yeah.” The boys face was blank,  though inside he grinned. The thought of what his and Elizabeth’s kids would look like was his new Guilt-ridden pleasure. 

“You get ze job done? I’m sorry if it vas too much.”

“Oh no no.” Billy’s shook his hands and walked down to meet her. “We got it done! Like I said we would.” 

“Good.” She turned to finish descending the stairs.

“Hey wait.” The boy ran around to stand before her. “I know you said I didn’t ow you anything after this. But how about tomorrow, me and my friends, we come here and help with the store.” Billy scratched the back of his head. “You know, fix the  door, and do the dust. Move heavy stuff.”

There was a worried look on the rabbit woman’s face, like she had stumbled across a recently snapped mouse trap. It didn’t help that, as she stood on the step above Billy, she looked taller, especially with her ears up in fear.

Then her mouth closed, and her lips turned into a smile and she didn’t even have her eyes opened as she pat Billy on the head.
“Sure boy.”
 
Elizabeth walked past the stunned boy. Her gentile touch was like a dream come true. 

“But I vill not pay for all of you after tomorrow.” She said as he passed. “I’m not made of money.” 

“God forbid you have to make money to pay for us.” Billy replied, tongue in cheek. 

And out back to the truck they went, all Four Boys and Four girls and Rabbit woman. And they were all driven to their homes, First Frank, Then Roger, then Mike and the girls, and Finally Billy. And all while sitting beside her in that cabin, driving around and down town, He looked out into the dimly lit buildings and dark woods, his brain wracked with unease. 

If someone were to describe Mr Young’s house, It’d be “on stilts.” 

A dozen thin, almost bending, pylons in four rows of three made the cottage’s foundation. All topping the decaying dunes overlooking Orc harbor some ten feet off the water. It was a cheap means to prevent its inevitable collapse as underneath the dunes eroded.
And because of its risky situation, it was a cheap means of living for Mister Young. 

Of course he didn’t see the shingles flaking off like scales off a dead fish. Or how the windows were always foggy thanks to the humidity. 

While Mr. Young was immature enough to have perfect vision, he always viewed the house with rose-tinted glasses. 

He saw a perfect humble abode from a golden era much forgotten by the townsfolk.

And Mr. Young viewed the townsfolk much like how they viewed erosion. 

A part of nature one could live with until it started to affect them personally. 

Through the cottage’s three rooms echoed the rythm of a type writer clacking. Mr Young was hunched over, typing on a document titled “Tiger troopers of Webbs and Catuvella.” Under his wrists, and around the type writer, and even a single page on the floor by his desk,  Homework. Turned in by his students, grades written quickly in red pen above each papers signature; ‘Colt; A.’ ‘Jennings; A.’  ‘Peers. B.’ ‘Callaghan. C.’ 

There was even a single post it note, taped to the page on the floor. ‘Not turned in - Wolcott.’ The page it was on was titled “Disciplinary Action”, dated two days before the present. 

With his right hand the teacher made an indent on the document and then reached for his coffee. Then his nose shifted to the right and he saw there was no coffee. And then, staring at the empty spot on his desk, he realized that night he hadn’t made coffee. 

Yet.

The floorboards underfoot made a creaking noise as he rose, almost like a parrot’s caw. Mr Young didn’t notice, his emotional state between angry and exhausted. He made way to the other wall of the room, against which was the kitchen. A gray sheet metal sink, a counter chipped with cut marks, and an oven with a counter top stove.

The counter opened with a caw noise much like the floorboard. Mr Young heard it this time but thought only of what was within; A bag of  coffee grounds. 

Pouring the bag’s contents into a pan, he turned the stove on and once more heard the caw. This time he swore he heard it come from behind.

As he filled the pan with water and set it to boil, Mister young faced the window. It was over his desk, as wide as the room and went from half the room to the ceiling. A great view of Webbs island and Orc Beach would be visible if it weren’t night and if fog didnt cover the window.

Still, Mr Young’s focus was on the glass. While he couldn’t see anything, and perhaps there was nothing to be seen, at the back of the teacher’s mind was a slight idea.

Woodpecker.

Then came what was without a doubt to the teacher a bird’s caw. 

“Yes, a woodpecker. They must sound like that.” He thought, and refocused on the coffee pot. “A woodpecker has confused a pylon for a tree and that’s why I hear him. He’s complaining.” 

A minute passed as the teacher stared at the bubbling brown liquid. His sinuses cleared as he breathed in the hot, delicious air which whafted off the coffee. Already, Mr Young was feeling its caffinate working through him. He felt ready to finish that paper.
Then again, the caw. And this time, he could guess its source. 

Below.

“You’ll find no worms in those trees Mister Woodpecker.” Chuckled the teacher, idle smile creeping across his face. “That wood is pressure treated.”

As the teacher’s weak laugh died down he realized maybe letting a bird eat at his house’s foundation wasn’t the best idea.
And so Mr young took the coffee pot off the stove and turned off the fire. He donned the jacket that hung behind his desk chair and walked past his bathroom and tiny bedroom to the door. Every step of his followed by a caw. 

He grabbed a snow shovel from beside the door, turned the nob, and walked onto the sand-covered porch. With a deep breath Mr Young smacked the end of the shovel against the outside floor once, twice, three times. Then, after putting his ear to the damp oaken wood and hearing no more cawing, he retired inside.

By now the coffee was warm, but not hot, so Mr Young poured it into the sink and started a new pot. And as the brown liquid boiled returned the cawing. This time it wasn’t in parody of the teacer’s actions but at a slow beat. “Caw... Caw... Caw...” 

Mister Young ignored it. He wasn’t going to let a second serving of coffee go wasted while he failed to spook off the woodpecker again.
And so when the coffee was done brewing, he poured himself a cup and returned to his seat. All while the cawing persisted.

And then as he started to type, he heard a new noise.

A tapping.

Tap tap. Tap tap. Tap tap. A slow ding like knuckles rasping the window in front of him. Mr Young looked all around but saw nothing, no bird nor person, tapping his window. Only hearing the  pecking as it began to sink with the Cawing. Caw. Tap. Caw. Tap. Caw. Tap. 
Soon Mister young was unable to hear himself think, the pace increasing so much for both noises it was like a siren right outside his walls. Mister young got up and pounded the wall. “Enough!” He cried.

It stopped. 

Then it began again at the same tempo. 

Mr Young could recognize student pranks from a mile away. 

He grabbed the snow shovel, opened the door, and yelled “WHOEVER IS OUT THERE I WILL CALL YOUR PARENTS RIGHT NOW!” 

The sounds persisted but noone was in the teacher’s view. Realizing they must be under his very house, Mr Young walked off the porch.
Once both of his feet were planted on the sand, stopped the cawing. 

“It’s too late now!” He said, anger pittering off as it became eerily silent. In a slow shuffle, he made around the porch, shovel in hand, approaching the cliff side.

Right next to the edge he stopped. Kneeling, he turned to look beneath his house and regretted he hadn’t brought a flashlight. He could not make out anything in that darkness. 

Then, he thought he saw something move.

“Hello?” he said.

There was a squawk. 

“Hello!” came a parrot. “I will call your parents right now! Squawk!”

Mr Young breathed a sigh of relief. It really was just a bird.

Wanting to just get rid of the damned thing, the underside of his house he poked and prodded.

Then, he touched something.

“SQUAWK. HELLO! CALL YOUR PARENTS RIGHT NOW!! SQUAWK!” 

It grabbed his shovel, and Mister Young yelped.

"SQUAWK! ITS TOO LATE NOW! SQUAWK!"

Off the sea below the moon reflected and its light curved around several claws that dug into the shovel’s handle. 

"CALL YOUR PARENTS!"

 



 


